Low positive predictive value of the oral brush biopsy in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.The authors evaluated the effectiveness of the oral brush biopsy technique as a diagnostic tool in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.In this cross-sectional study, pathologic reports (n = 152) from the scalpel biopsies (tissue samples) in patients who previously tested either "positive" (n = 3) or "atypical" (n = 149) for dysplasia by brush biopsy (OralCDx) were evaluated. Information on the age and sex of the patient, the site of the lesion, the brush biopsy results, and the histopathologic diagnosis of the scalpel biopsy was collected. The positive predictive values (PPVs) for "abnormal," "atypical," and "positive" brush biopsies were determined.Overall, the PPV of an abnormal brush biopsy was only 7.9% (95% confidence interval [CI], 4.2%-13.4%), and the PPV of an "atypical" brush biopsy was 7.4% (95% CI, 3.7%-12.8%). Of the 3 positive brush biopsies, only 1 was identified as dysplastic. The proportion of false-positive biopsy results was as high as 92.1% (95% CI, 86.6%-95.9%).The OralCDx technique overestimated dysplastic lesions and produced a high number of false-positive results.Multi-class classification algorithm for optical diagnosis of oral cancer.We report development of a direct multi-class spectroscopic diagnostic algorithm for discrimination of high-grade cancerous tissue sites from low-grade as well as precancerous and normal squamous tissue sites of human oral cavity. The algorithm was developed making use of the recently formulated theory of total principal component regression (TPCR). The in vivo autofluorescence spectral data acquired from patients screened for neoplasm of oral cavity at the Government Cancer Hospital, Indore, was used to train and validate the algorithm. The diagnostic algorithm based on TPCR was found to provide satisfactory performance in classifying the tissue sites in four different classes - high-grade squamous cell carcinoma, low-grade squamous cell carcinoma, leukoplakia, and normal squamous tissue. The classification accuracy for these four classes was observed to be approximately 94%, 100%, 100% and 91% for the training data set (based on leave-one-out cross-validation), and was approximately 90%, 90%, 85% and 88%, respectively for the corresponding classes for the independent validation data set.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric very early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA-image cytometry applied to suspicious oral lesions compared with synchronous histology.Brush- and scalpel biopsies were obtained from 98 patients with suspicious oral lesions. In cases, in which EC revealed malignant or suspicious cells, nuclear DNA-contents were measured using a TV image analysis system.Among 98 oral lesions both cytological and histological diagnosis showed no sign of malignancy or dysplasia in 75. In 23 cases cytology yielded tumor cell-positive (15), suspicious (four) or doubtful (four) results. DNA-cytometry showed aneuploidy in 19 of these. The comparison between cytological diagnosis combined with DNA-cytometry and biopsy-histology resulted in a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 97.4%.In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific and non-invasive method for the early diagnosis of oral epithelial neoplasia, showing excellent compliance among patients.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this prospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from white-spotted, ulcerated or other suspicious oral lesions in our clinic. In addition we checked DNA-image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA-aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for the early identification of tumor cells in oral brushings.251 cytological diagnoses obtained from exfoliative smears of 181 patients from macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa and from clinically seemingly benign oral lesions which were excised for establishing histological diagnoses were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally nuclear DNA-contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 94.6%, specificity 99.5%, positive predictive value 98.1% and negative predictive value 98.5%. DNA-aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA-stemlines or cells with DNA-content greater 9c were observed. On this basis the prevalence of DNA-aneuploidy in smears of oral squamous cell carcinomas in situ or invasive carcinomas was 96.4%. Sensitivity of DNA-aneuploidy in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 96.4%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100% and negative 99.0%. The combination of both techniques increased the sensitivity to 98.2%, specificity to 100%, positive predictive value to 100% and negative to 99.5%.Brush cytology of all visible oral lesions, if they are clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, cheap, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions, carcinoma in situ or invasive squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA-image cytometry is a very sensitive, highly specific and objective adjuvant tool for the early identification of neoplastic epithelial cells in oral smears.Salivary transcriptome diagnostics for oral cancer detection.Oral fluid (saliva) meets the demand for noninvasive, accessible, and highly efficient diagnostic medium. Recent discovery that a large panel of human RNA can be reliably detected in saliva gives rise to a novel clinical approach, salivary transcriptome diagnostics. The purpose of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic value of this new approach by using oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC) as the proof-of-principle disease.Unstimulated saliva was collected from patients (n = 32) with primary T1/T2 OSCC and normal subjects (n = 32) with matched age, gender, and smoking history. RNA isolation was done from the saliva supernatant, followed by two-round linear amplification with T7 RNA polymerase. Human Genome U133A microarrays were applied for profiling human salivary transcriptome. The different gene expression patterns were analyzed by combining a t test comparison and a fold-change analysis on 10 matched cancer patients and controls. Quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) was used to validate the selected genes that showed significant difference (P < 0.01) by microarray. The predictive power of these salivary mRNA biomarkers was analyzed by receiver operating characteristic curve and classification models.Microarray analysis showed there are 1,679 genes exhibited significantly different expression level in saliva between cancer patients and controls (P < 0.05). Seven cancer-related mRNA biomarkers that exhibited at least a 3.5-fold elevation in OSCC saliva (P < 0.01) were consistently validated by qPCR on saliva samples from OSCC patients (n = 32) and controls (n = 32). These potential salivary RNA biomarkers are transcripts of IL8, IL1B, DUSP1, HA3, OAZ1, S100P, and SAT. The combinations of these biomarkers yielded sensitivity (91%) and specificity (91%) in distinguishing OSCC from the controls.The utility of salivary transcriptome diagnostics is successfully demonstrated in this study for oral cancer detection. This novel clinical approach could be exploited to a robust, high-throughput, and reproducible tool for early cancer detection. Salivary transcriptome profiling can be applied to evaluate its usefulness for other major disease applications as well as for normal health surveillance.[Minimally invasive brush-biopsy: innovative method for early diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma].The aim of this prospective and blinded study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of conventional cytopathology of oral brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions. In addition we checked slide based DNA image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for earliest detection of oral cancer using brush biopsies. Therefore the nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen re-staining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater 9c were observed. Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells thus was 91.3%, specificity for the detection of non-neoplastic cells was 95.1%, positive predictive value 94.4% and negative predictive value 92.3%. The adjuvant DNA image cytometry reached a sensitivity of 97.8%, the specificity and the positive predictive value were 100% and negative predictive value was 98.1%, respectively. Smears from oral brush biopsies of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, minimal invasive, painless and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinomas in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric examination of oral lesions in lichen planus.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA image cytometry applied to oral lesions of lichen planus (LP; n = 56), in order to detect or exclude malignant transformation.Brush and excisional biopsies were obtained from 56 patients. In cases of oral LP in which brush biopsies were suspicious for tumor cells, nuclear DNA contents were measured, using a TV Image Analysis System.In 50 patients EC yielded tumor cell-negative, doubtful in four cases and suspicious results obtained in two cases. DNA image cytometry revealed DNA-aneuploidy only in the two suspicious cases. The comparison between cytologic/DNA-cytometric diagnosis and biopsy histology resulted in a total agreement (LP without dysplasia: 54 and squamous cell carcinoma in LP: two cases).In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific, and non-invasive method, which can be used for periodical follow up of oral LP lesions in order to early detect or exclude malignancy.[Performance of conventional oral brush biopsies].This study evaluated the performance of oral brush biopsies using standard morphological analysis and haematoxylin and eosin (HE) staining for detecting oral squamous cell carcinomas and their respective precursor lesionsBrush biopsies were obtained in 169 consecutive patients who underwent routine biopsies and histological examination for clinically suspicious oral lesions. Air-dried smears were processed by acetone fixation and HE staining. Cytological assessment used well-established criteria of atypia to classify the specimen as either "tumor negative" (no signs of atypia, no malignant cells) or "tumor positive" (malignant cells, any sign of atypia or doubtful cells).Despite a sufficient number of cells, a definite cytological diagnosis could not be established in six cases. According to the criteria specified above, these specimens were classified as "tumor positive." The cytological analysis identified 49 out of 62 oral malignancies (sensitivity 79%). Seven out of 107 benign lesions were classified as false positive (specificity 93%). The positive and negative predictive values were each 88%.Oral brush biopsies will identify only about 80% of oral malignancies when the smears are processed by routine HE stains and are analysed via standard morphological criteria. Thus, this technique should not be used for diagnostic proof or to exclude malignant cells in a lesion suspicious for cancer. However, oral brush biopsy provides a versatile back-up strategy to uncover the true nature of the disease if a lesion is clinically considered benign by mistake.Cytology of the oral cavity: a re-evaluation.Oral exfoliative cytology, while an economical and practical tool for diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, is not extensively used. The results of conventional (n = 89) and liquid-based (n = 411) oral diagnostic cytology cases are reported and compared to histological diagnosis. Cells were collected using either a Cytobrush device for conventional smears or a dermatological curette (AcuDispo) for liquid-based (Thin Prep) cytology. The "curette technique" allowed for the collection of "accidental" tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies. The sensitivity was 86.5% in conventional and 94.7% in liquid-based cytology; specificity was 94.3% and 98.9%, respectively; inadequate samples were present in 12.4% and 8.8% of cases, respectively. Although conventional cytology may be useful in oral squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, liquid-based cytology gives better results, enhances both the sensitivity and specificity, and also provides material for further investigations, e.g. DNA ploidy studies, microhistology, etc.Improved diagnosis of oral premalignant lesions in submucous fibrosis patients with 5-aminolevulinic acid induced PpIX fluorescence.We investigate the possibility of using ALA-derived PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy for the detection of epithelial hyperkeratosis (EH) or epithelial dysplasia (ED) lesions in oral submucous fibrosis (OSF) patients that could not be found by autofluorescence spectroscopy. Twenty percent of ALA solution gel was applied onto oral neoplasia and surrounding normal tissue [normal oral mucosa (NOM)] for 90 min. Fluorescence emission spectra were measured under 410 nm excitation. Generally, the most intense fluorescence emission peaks occurred at 460 and 630 nm. The ratios of the area under red peak (630+/-10 nm) to the area under blue peak (460+/-10 nm), denoted as RB, were calculated. We found that OSF mucosa has the lowest RB value, followed by NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF. An ANOVA test showed significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (p<0.05). However, measurements of autofluorescence (i.e., before ALA application) show no significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (ANOVA test, p>0.05). These results indicate that ALA-induced PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy could be used to identify the premalignant lesions on oral fibrotic mucosa, which could not be found by autofluorescence.Sensitivity and specificity of oral brush biopsy.The aim of this study was to evaluate the advantage of computer-assisted analysis of the oral brush biopsy compared with synchronous scalpel biopsy in the early detection of oral lesions. In this prospective, randomized, controlled study, brush and scalpel biopsies were performed on 75 patients. Six patients had to be excluded due to inadequate results, and 43 were shown to have dysplastic epithelium, 15 carcinoma, and 11 suspicious lesions. Therefore, the sensitivity for the detection of abnormal cells by means of OralCDx was 52%, specificity 29%, and the positive predictive value 63%. According to our results, the use of oral brush biopsy as a standardized, minimally invasive method of screening oral lesions should be reconsidered.Diffuse reflection spectroscopy: an alternative to autofluorescence spectroscopy in tongue cancer detection.Laser-induced autofluorescence (LIAF) and diffuse reflection spectroscopy (DRS) are two emerging noninvasive optical tools that have shown immense potential to detect oral cavity pre-cancer. In a recent study, we have used spectral ratio reference standards (SRRS) of LIAF intensity ratios F500/F635, F500/F685, and F500/F705 for grading of tissues belonging to sites other than dorsal side of tongue (DST), lateral side of tongue (LST), and vermillion border of lip (VBL) that exhibited similar spectral shape for normal and abnormal tissues. This led to dismal diagnostic accuracies, and for the three LIAF-SRRS, normal tissue values were often misclassified as squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), which means that the true negatives were being wrongly identified as true positives. This study examines the applicability of the site-specific diffuse reflection spectral intensity ratio (R545/R575) of the oxygenated hemoglobin bands to classify different DST lesions and compares the results obtained with those obtained using LIAF-SRRS. DRS-SRRS of R545/R575 differentiated benign hyperplastic DST tissues from normal tissue with a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 80%, which were indistinguishable using LIAF-SRRS. Further, in distinguishing hyperplastic tissues from premalignant dysplastic lesions, DRS-SRRS gave a sensitivity of 90% and a specificity of 86%, as compared to sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 72% shown by the three LIAF-SRRS together. The diagnostic accuracy and statistical adequacy of the two techniques were assessed by receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC-Curve) analysis. Three LIAF ratios gave a low overall ROC area under curve (ROC-AUCs) of 0.521, whereas the DR ratio (R545/R575) has shown an improved accuracy of 0.970 in differentiating different tissue types. While distinguishing hyperplastic from dysplastic tissues, the DR ratio gave a higher discrimination accuracy of 0.9. Based on these findings, it can be concluded that the DRS-SRRS technique by virtue of its low cost and higher diagnostic accuracies could be a viable alternate to LIAF-SRRS for in vivo screening of tongue pre-cancers and grading of different tissue types.[Toluidine blue solution as a diagnostic aid in oropharyngeal cancer].In the literature exist investigations made to extensive series of patients, with premalignant oral lesions or suspicious of malignancy, in which it has been employed toluidine blue (TB), to verify the trustiness of this method as a resource for support in clinical diagnosis. The results are favourable whenever is observed the correct realization of the technique that must be preceded by a careful buccal exploration and that both findings be corroborated. This work tries to exemplificate one of the techniques of TB as will as the results obtained in 28 patients, whom, for their characteristics were considered of High Risk. Emphasis is made in relation to the false positive found. Besides, is insisted in the convenience of the routine use of this resource in the odontologic private practice and at institutional level in patients over 50 years old, to whom is necessary to accomplish at a time an adequate patient history and an accurate intraoral examination, that in addition to the use of TB, will make feasible to detect more cases of malignant lesions in early stages.Toluidine blue staining and early detection of oral precancerous and malignant lesions.Noninvasive evaluation of oral lesions using depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy.Optical spectroscopy is a noninvasive technique with potential applications for diagnosis of oral dysplasia and early cancer. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic performance of a depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy (DSOS) system for distinguishing dysplasia and carcinoma from non-neoplastic oral mucosa.Patients with oral lesions and volunteers without any oral abnormalities were recruited to participate. Autofluorescence and diffuse reflectance spectra of selected oral sites were measured using the DSOS system. A total of 424 oral sites in 124 subjects were measured and analyzed, including 154 sites in 60 patients with oral lesions and 270 sites in 64 normal volunteers. Measured optical spectra were used to develop computer-based algorithms to identify the presence of dysplasia or cancer. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated using a gold standard of histopathology for patient sites and clinical impression for normal volunteer sites.Differences in oral spectra were observed in: (1) neoplastic versus nonneoplastic sites, (2) keratinized versus nonkeratinized tissue, and (3) shallow versus deep depths within oral tissue. Algorithms based on spectra from 310 nonkeratinized anatomic sites (buccal, tongue, floor of mouth, and lip) yielded an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.96 in the training set and 0.93 in the validation set.The ability to selectively target epithelial and shallow stromal depth regions appeared to be diagnostically useful. For nonkeratinized oral sites, the sensitivity and specificity of this objective diagnostic technique were comparable to that of clinical diagnosis by expert observers. Thus, DSOS has potential to augment oral cancer screening efforts in community settings.Reliability of cytologic smear in diagnosis of oral cancer. A controlled study.Laser-induced fluorescence imaging in localization of head and neck cancers.Laser-induced fluorescence tumor imaging exploits the difference in tissue autofluorescence properties between normal and cancerous tissues. The effectiveness and reliability of fluorescence imaging with a lung imaging fluorescence endoscopy (LIFE) system for cancers in the head and neck were compared to those of white light endoscopy (WLE). Examinations by WLE and LIFE were conducted on 25 patients suspected for malignancy. Histologic diagnosis was confirmed by biopsy. Posttreatment evaluations were performed on 6 cancer patients identified by this study. By LIFE, all 16 cancerous lesions, including 2 occult cancers, were identified (100%), while WLE achieved only an 87.5% detection rate. LIFE (specificity 87.5%) was greatly helpful to WLE (specificity 50%) in differentiating inflammation from malignancy, though it failed to exclude granuloma. The results of this study suggest potential roles of LIFE in early detection, correct staging, and treatment evaluation of cancers in the head and neck.Oral fluorescence imaging using 405-nm excitation, aiding the discrimination of cancers and precancers by identifying changes in collagen and elastic breakdown and neovascularization in the underlying stroma.Optical spectroscopy and imaging devices are being developed and tested for the screening and diagnosis of cancer and precancer in multiple organ sites.The aim of the study reported here is to optimize the capability of an optical imaging device to discriminate precancerous tissue from other lesions by identifying ideal excitation wavelengths.The studies reported here used a prototype of a direct fluorescence imaging device that uses 405-nm illumination to excite tissue.There is ample evidence in the literature that 405 nm can distinguish oral cancers from normal tissue. Higher wavelengths may be necessary to differentiate potential confounding lesions, such as abrasions, burns, viral infections, inflammation, and gingivitis.Imaging at 405 nm could help doctors detect precancerous and cancerous oral lesions. Such imaging could be used by dentists, family practitioners, otorhinolaryngologists, general surgeons, obstetrician gynecologists, and internists, and could greatly increase the number of patients who have lesions detected in the precancerous phase.The impact of liquid-based oral cytology on the diagnosis of oral squamous dysplasia and carcinoma.Even though diagnostic oral exfoliative cytology is a useful, economical and practical tool in the diagnosis of oral dysplasia and carcinoma, it is not yet extensively used. The results of conventional exfoliative and liquid-based diagnostic cytology in oral potentially malignant lesions (PML) are herein reported and compared with the histological diagnosis.Either conventional (89) or liquid-based (384) exfoliative cytology was used for the diagnosis of oral dysplasia/carcinoma in 473 subjects and the results were compared with scalpel biopsy histology. Cells were collected using a Cytobrush device for conventional smears and with a dermatological curette for the liquid-based cytology. The 'curette technique' also allowed for the collection of 'accidental' tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies.Histological diagnosis was squamous carcinoma in 96 of 473 cases, high-grade dysplasia (oral intraepithelial neoplasia two to three) in 24 and other lesions in 353 cases. The smears in the conventional cytology group were inadequate in 12.4%, with an 85.7% sensitivity and a 95.9% specificity. There were 8.8% of inadequate specimens in the liquid-based cytology group; sensitivity was 95.1% and specificity was 99.0%.Although conventional cytology is useful when diagnosing oral PML (better sensitivity and predictive positive value if compared with the cervical smear test with similar specificity) and can improve the accuracy of histological diagnosis, liquid-based cytology gives better results, as it not only enhances both sensitivity and specificity, but also provides material for further investigation (AgNORs, DNA, microbiopsies, etc.).Laminin-5 immunocytochemistry: a new tool for identifying dysplastic cells in oral brush biopsies.The brush biopsy technique is not only a seminal technique but also a critically discussed method for detection of oral pre-cancerous stages and manifest carcinomas. The gamma2 chain of laminin-5 and its proteolytic fragments comprise an invasion factor for many carcinomas.The aim of this study was to determine whether the immunocytochemical presentation of the laminin gamma2 chain identifies pre-invasive or invasive squamous cells in brush biopsies.The value-based identification of atypical epithelia was analysed in 93 consecutive brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses: standardized haematoxylin and eosin staining; standardized immunocytochemistry: monoclonal antibodies against laminin gamma2 chain: D4B5, 4G1, detection using ChemMate and Autostainer.Conventional cytology did not result in any false-positive cases, i.e. atypical cells in normal, inflamed or benignly hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity, 100%), whereas immunocytochemistry revealed one false-positive case (specificity, 98%). In brush biopsies of oral squamous cell carcinomas, the following immunocytochemical patterns were possible: (1) staining of the cytoplasm, (2) banded markings between clumped carcinoma cells and (3) positive hazes surrounding atypical cells. Bacterial colonies appeared as false-positive results. Four of 27 carcinomas and one of three recurrences were not cytologically identified (sensitivity of conventional cytology, 79%). Three of the five carcinomas not identified by cytology were immunocytochemically stained with laminin gamma2 chain antibody (sensitivity of laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry, 93%). The positive predictive value was 100% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry. The negative predictive value attained was 92% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry.The high sensitivity level observed for method-enhanced brush cytology suggests that this technique be used as an initial diagnostic step.An audit of the efficacy of the oral brush biopsy technique in a specialist Oral Medicine unit.The diagnosis of oral epithelial dysplasia has traditionally been based upon histopathological evaluation of a full thickness biopsy specimen from lesional tissue. It has recently been proposed that cytological examination of "brush biopsy" samples is a non-invasive method of determining the presence of cellular atypia, and hence the likelihood of oral epithelial dysplasia. The present audit determined, retrospectively the sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the oral brush biopsy technique in the diagnosis of potentially malignant disease in a group of 112 patients attending a specialist Oral Medicine unit. The sensitivity of detection of oral epithelial dysplasia or squamous cell carcinoma of the oral brush biopsy system was 71.4% while the specificity was 32%. The positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy result (positive or atypical) was 44.1%, while the negative predictive value was 60%. It is concluded that not all potentially malignant disease is detected with this non-invasive investigative procedure.A comparative study of normal inspection, autofluorescence and 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence for oral cancer diagnosis.Fluorescence diagnosis aims to improve the management of oral cancer via early detection of the malignant lesions and better delimitation of the tumor margins. This paper presents a comparative study of normal inspection, combined fluorescence diagnosis (CFD) and its 2 main components, autofluorescence and 5-aminolevulinic acid (5-ALA)-induced protoporphyrin IX (PPIX) fluorescence. Biopsy-controlled fluorescence imaging and spectral analysis were performed on a total of 85 patients with suspected or histologically proven oral carcinoma both before and after topical administration of 5-ALA (200 mg 5-ALA dissolved in 50 ml of H(2)0). Fluorescence excitation was accomplished using filtered light of a xenon short arc lamp (lambda = 375-440 nm). As for CFD, a "streetlight" contrast (red to green) was readily found between malignant and healthy tissue on the acquired images. In terms of tumor localization and delimitation properties, CFD was clearly favorable over either normal inspection or its 2 components in fluorescence imaging. The performance of CFD was found to be impeded by tumor keratinization but to be independent of either tumor staging, grading or localization. In spectral analysis, cancerous tissue showed significantly higher PPIX fluorescence intensities and lower autofluorescence intensities than normal mucosa. There is a great potential for CFD in early detection of oral neoplasms and exact delimitation of the tumors' superficial margins and an advantage over white light inspection and each of its 2 main components. The method is noninvasive, safe and easily reproducible.[Noninvasive brush biopsy as an innovative tool for early detection of oral carcinomas].The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of DNA image cytometry in combination with non-invasive brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions.Cytological diagnoses obtained from 1328 exfoliative smears of 332 different lesions were compared with histology and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally, nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater than 9c were observed. RESULTS; The sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in addition to DNA image cytometry on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 97.8%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, and negative predictive value 98.1%.The application of DNA image cytometry with DNA aneuploidy as a marker for neoplastic transformation in oral smears secures cytologic diagnosis of carcinomas. Smears from brushings of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, noninvasive, painless, and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective, and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.RELIABILITY OF ORAL EXFOLIATIVE CYTOLOGY FOR DETECTION OF ORAL CANCER.High-molecular tenascin-C as an indicator of atypical cells in oral brush biopsies.Tumour-invasion like wound healing is characterised by the formation of an extracellular matrix with a high tenascin-C content. The tenascin-C molecule undergoes alternative splicing. Analysis using antibody BC2 indicates that especially the high-molecular tenascin-C (hm tn-C) variants are typically tumour-associated, while distribution in normal tissue is restrictive. This study investigated whether hm tn-C is a suitable indicator of atypical cells with invasive potential in oral brush biopsies. One hundred fifty nine consecutive oral brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses were analysed for the identification of atypical cells. A standardised haematoxylin and eosin staining plus standardised immunocytochemistry using the monoclonal anti-hm tn-C antibody was performed. The bound hm tn-C antibodies were detected with the streptavidine/alkaline phosphatase technique in the autostainer. Conventional cytology produced four false-positives when identifying atypical cells in brush biopsies of inflammatory/benign hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity 96%), while 10 in 52 carcinomas and three of eight recurrences were not identified (sensitivity 78%). Ten of these 13 non-identified tumours could be marked when adding the hm tn-C assay (increasing specificity to 99%). Combining the two assays also reduced the false-positive outcomes from four to one (increasing sensitivity to 95%). The positive and negative predictive values were 92 and 88% for conventional cytology vs 98 and 97% for the dual assay. (1) A 95%-sensitivity proves hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to be a suitable means of identifying atypical cells in oral brush biopsies. (2) The positive (98%) and negative (97%) predictive values obtained approximate hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to laminin-5 (100/97%).The use of the PAPNET automated cytological screening system for the diagnosis of oral squamous carcinoma.The automated PAPNET screening system has been developed to recognize abnormal cells in cervical smears. Given that the oral mucosa sheds cells resembling superficial and intermediate cells of the cervix, the aim of this study was to assess whether the PAPNET system could be used to detect dysplastic cells in oral mucosal smears. Sixty-two oral smears from 27 patients were examined by both light microscopy and using the PAPNET system from clinically abnormal and normal areas by two pathologists. The clinically abnormal sites were also biopsied for histological analysis. There was 100% correlation between the manual and PAPNET screening results. Cytological interpretation of oral smears by both manual and PAPNET screening methods correctly diagnosed squamous cell carcinoma in 14/23 (61%) of patients who had all been confirmed by biopsy. The nine patients with false-negative cases could be attributed to poor smear technique and preparation. The PAPNET system can be used to identify abnormal cells in oral smears and, as such, may have an application for screening those populations at high risk of oral cancer--provided that adequate tuition is given in smear technique.Noninvasive fluorescence excitation spectroscopy for the diagnosis of oral neoplasia in vivo.Fluorescence excitation spectroscopy (FES) is an emerging approach to cancer detection. The goal of this pilot study is to evaluate the diagnostic potential of FES technique for the detection and characterization of normal and cancerous oral lesions in vivo. Fluorescence excitation (FE) spectra from oral mucosa were recorded in the spectral range of 340 to 600 nm at 635 nm emission using a fiberoptic probe spectrofluorometer to obtain spectra from the buccal mucosa of 30 sites of 15 healthy volunteers and 15 sites of 10 cancerous patients. Significant FE spectral differences were observed between normal and well differentiated squamous cell carcinoma (WDSCC) oral lesions. The FE spectra of healthy volunteers consists of a broad emission band around 440 to 470 nm, whereas in WDSCC lesions, a new primary peak was seen at 410 nm with secondary peaks observed at 505, 540, and 580 nm due to the accumulation of porphyrins in oral lesions. The FE spectral bands of the WDSCC lesions resemble the typical absorption spectra of a porphyrin. Three potential ratios (I410/I505, I410/I540, and I410/I580) were calculated from the FE spectra and used as input variables for a stepwise linear discriminant analysis (SLDA) for normal and WDSCC groups. Leave-one-out (LOO) method of cross-validation was performed to check the reliability on spectral data for tissue characterization. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity were determined for normal and WDSCC lesions from the scatter plot of the discriminant function scores. It was observed that diagnostic algorithm based on discriminant function scores obtained by SLDA-LOO method was able to distinguish WDSCC from normal lesions with a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 100%. Results of the pilot study demonstrate that the FE spectral changes due to porphyrin have a good diagnostic potential; therefore, porphyrin can be used as a native tumor marker.Clinical evaluation of an autofluorescence diagnostic device for oral cancer detection: a prospective randomized diagnostic study.The prognosis for patients with oral squamous cell carcinoma remains poor despite advances in multimodal treatment concepts. Early diagnosis and treatment is the key to improved patient survival. A device (VELscope) that uses autofluorescence technology, allowing direct fluorescence visualization of the oral cavity, might be a useful tool for oral cancer detection or as an adjunct to standard clinical examination. A total of 289 patients with oral premalignant lesions were randomly divided into two groups for clinical examination of precancerous oral lesions. In group 1, 166 patients were examined conventionally with white light, and in group 2, 123 patients were examined with the autofluorescence visualization device (VELscope) in addition to the white light examination. Biopsies were obtained from all suspicious areas identified in both examination groups (n=52). In the first step, baseline characteristics of the two groups (only white light vs. white light and VELscope) were compared to exclude selection bias. In the second step, for the group examined with white light and VELscope (123 patients), the diagnostic strategies were compared with regard to sensitivity and specificity using biopsy as the gold standard. The results showed that using the VELscope leads to higher sensitivity (100% instead of 17%), but to lower specificity (74% instead of 97%). Thus, we can conclude that the VELscope is a useful new diagnostic device for detection of oral cancer diseases.Comparison of the Cytobrush®, dermatological curette and oral CDx® brush test as methods for obtaining samples of RNA for molecular analysis of oral cytology.Interest in oral exfoliative cytology has increased with the availability of molecular markers that may lead to the earlier diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma. This research aims to compare the efficacy of three different instruments (Cytobrush, curette and Oral CDx brush) in providing adequate material for molecular analysis.One hundred and four cytological samples obtained from volunteer healthy subjects were analysed using all three instruments. The clinical and demographical variables under study were age, sex and smoking habits. The three instruments were compared for their ability to obtain adequate samples and for the amount of RNA obtained using quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR-qRT) analysis of the Abelson (ABL) housekeeping gene.RNA of the ABL gene has been quantified by number of copies. Adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with a curette (90.6%) or Oral CDx (80.0%) than a Cytobrush (48.6%); P < 0.001. Similarly, the RNA quantification was 17.64 ± 21.10 with a curette, 16.04 ± 15.81 with Oral CDx and 6.82 ± 6.71 with a Cytobrush. There were statistically significant differences between the Cytobrush and curette (P = 0.008) and between the Cytobrush and OralCDx (P = 0.034). There was no difference according to the demographical variables.Oral exfoliative cytology is a simple, non-invasive technique that provides sufficient RNA to perform studies on gene expression. Although material was obtained with all three instruments, adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with the curette or Oral CDx than with a Cytobrush. The Oral CDx is a less aggressive instrument than the curette, so could be a useful tool in a clinical setting.Diagnostic value of nucleolar organizer regions (AgNORs) in brush biopsies of suspicious lesions of the oral cavity.The aim of this retrospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of AgNOR-analysis as an adjunctive diagnostic tool of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from suspicious lesions in our clinic.Cytological diagnoses obtained from brush biopsies of macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa from 75 patients (final diagnoses: 53 histologically proven squamous cell carcinomas, 11 leukoplakias and other inflammatory oral lesions) and from 11 patients with normal mucosa as a negative control group were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups. Five smears were doubtful and seven suspicious for tumor cells in the cytologic report. Number of AgNOR's were counted in 100 squamous epithelial cell-nuclei per slide after silver-restaining.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis alone on oral smears for the detection of squamous carcinomas was 92.5%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value was 100% and negative 84.6%. The best cut-off value of the mean number of AgNOR dots per nucleus distinguishing benign from malignant cells was 4.8. The percentage of nuclei with more than three AgNORs had a cut-off level of 70%. Applying these methods to twelve doubtful or suspicious cytological diagnoses we were able to correctly establish the diagnosis of malignancy in ten cases of histologically proven cancers and to reveal benignity in two histologically proven cases. Thus we achieved a positive and negative predictive value of 100% each.Smears from brushings of visible oral lesions, if clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral cancerous lesions. We conclude that AgNOR-analysis may be a useful adjunct to other methods in routine cytological diagnosis of oral cancer that can help to solve cytologically suspicious or doubtful cases.Utility of toluidine blue staining and brush biopsy in precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.To evaluate the usefulness of toluidine blue and brush biopsy in precancerous oral lesions and squamous cell carcinoma.The study was conducted at Moti Lal Nehru Medical College, Allahabad, India. Ninety-six patients with suspicious oral lesions who attended the outpatient clinics of otorhinolaryngology were screened with in vivo toluidine blue staining and oral brush biopsy.Oral brush biopsy showed high specificity and sensitivity. Toluidine blue staining was highly sensitive and moderately specific for malignant lesions but less sensitive for premalignant lesions.Early detection of oral carcinoma is possible even at the precancerous stages by using noninvasive, painless and outpatient procedures, such as in vivo toluidine blue staining and brush biopsy.Assessment of oral premalignancy using elastic scattering spectroscopy.Optical spectroscopy systems have been involved in various clinical fields; however the main interest is still in the diagnosis of premalignant/malignant lesions. The aim of this study was to compare findings of Elastic Scattering Spectroscopy (ESS) with histopathology of oral tissues to see if this technique could be used as an adjunct or alternative to histopathology in identifying dysplasia. The technique involves the use of Mie scattering and is a simple non-invasive method of tissue interrogation. Twenty-five oral sites from 25 patients who presented with oral leukoplakia were examined by ESS using a pulsed xenon-arc lamp. Surgical biopsies were acquired from each of the examination sites. The results of the acquired spectra were then compared with histopathology. Two sets of spectra were obtained, and by using a linear discriminant analysis, a sensitivity of 72% and a specificity of 75% were obtained. These results are promising and could suggest that ESS may be able to identify dysplasia in oral tissues. To prove the usefulness of the ESS in dysplasia detection in oral tissues conclusively, a larger body of data is needed. We aim to continue this study to obtain more data in an attempt to increase the accuracy of the technique. Large, multi-centre trails are needed for each anatomical site, in order to gather more information about the differences between normal and dysplastic tissue.Low positive predictive value of the oral brush biopsy in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.The authors evaluated the effectiveness of the oral brush biopsy technique as a diagnostic tool in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.In this cross-sectional study, pathologic reports (n = 152) from the scalpel biopsies (tissue samples) in patients who previously tested either "positive" (n = 3) or "atypical" (n = 149) for dysplasia by brush biopsy (OralCDx) were evaluated. Information on the age and sex of the patient, the site of the lesion, the brush biopsy results, and the histopathologic diagnosis of the scalpel biopsy was collected. The positive predictive values (PPVs) for "abnormal," "atypical," and "positive" brush biopsies were determined.Overall, the PPV of an abnormal brush biopsy was only 7.9% (95% confidence interval [CI], 4.2%-13.4%), and the PPV of an "atypical" brush biopsy was 7.4% (95% CI, 3.7%-12.8%). Of the 3 positive brush biopsies, only 1 was identified as dysplastic. The proportion of false-positive biopsy results was as high as 92.1% (95% CI, 86.6%-95.9%).The OralCDx technique overestimated dysplastic lesions and produced a high number of false-positive results.Multi-class classification algorithm for optical diagnosis of oral cancer.We report development of a direct multi-class spectroscopic diagnostic algorithm for discrimination of high-grade cancerous tissue sites from low-grade as well as precancerous and normal squamous tissue sites of human oral cavity. The algorithm was developed making use of the recently formulated theory of total principal component regression (TPCR). The in vivo autofluorescence spectral data acquired from patients screened for neoplasm of oral cavity at the Government Cancer Hospital, Indore, was used to train and validate the algorithm. The diagnostic algorithm based on TPCR was found to provide satisfactory performance in classifying the tissue sites in four different classes - high-grade squamous cell carcinoma, low-grade squamous cell carcinoma, leukoplakia, and normal squamous tissue. The classification accuracy for these four classes was observed to be approximately 94%, 100%, 100% and 91% for the training data set (based on leave-one-out cross-validation), and was approximately 90%, 90%, 85% and 88%, respectively for the corresponding classes for the independent validation data set.Usefulness of fluorescence photography for diagnosis of oral cancer.This study was carried out to evaluate the validity of fluorescence photography as an adjunctive diagnostic method for oral cancer. Fluorescence photography was performed on 130 oral lesions in 130 patients. Lesions showing red, orange or pink fluorescence on the photographs were defined as positive, while all other lesions were considered negative. Seventy-two (91.1%) of 79 carcinomas and 6 (85.7%) of 7 epithelial dysplasias were judged as positive, whereas two (4.5%) of 44 benign lesions that were not dysplasias showed positive fluorescence. Sixty-nine (94.5%) of 73 squamous cell carcinomas showed positive fluorescence. These results suggest that fluorescence photography is useful as an adjunctive diagnostic method for oral squamous cell carcinoma.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric very early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA-image cytometry applied to suspicious oral lesions compared with synchronous histology.Brush- and scalpel biopsies were obtained from 98 patients with suspicious oral lesions. In cases, in which EC revealed malignant or suspicious cells, nuclear DNA-contents were measured using a TV image analysis system.Among 98 oral lesions both cytological and histological diagnosis showed no sign of malignancy or dysplasia in 75. In 23 cases cytology yielded tumor cell-positive (15), suspicious (four) or doubtful (four) results. DNA-cytometry showed aneuploidy in 19 of these. The comparison between cytological diagnosis combined with DNA-cytometry and biopsy-histology resulted in a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 97.4%.In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific and non-invasive method for the early diagnosis of oral epithelial neoplasia, showing excellent compliance among patients.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this prospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from white-spotted, ulcerated or other suspicious oral lesions in our clinic. In addition we checked DNA-image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA-aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for the early identification of tumor cells in oral brushings.251 cytological diagnoses obtained from exfoliative smears of 181 patients from macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa and from clinically seemingly benign oral lesions which were excised for establishing histological diagnoses were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally nuclear DNA-contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 94.6%, specificity 99.5%, positive predictive value 98.1% and negative predictive value 98.5%. DNA-aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA-stemlines or cells with DNA-content greater 9c were observed. On this basis the prevalence of DNA-aneuploidy in smears of oral squamous cell carcinomas in situ or invasive carcinomas was 96.4%. Sensitivity of DNA-aneuploidy in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 96.4%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100% and negative 99.0%. The combination of both techniques increased the sensitivity to 98.2%, specificity to 100%, positive predictive value to 100% and negative to 99.5%.Brush cytology of all visible oral lesions, if they are clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, cheap, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions, carcinoma in situ or invasive squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA-image cytometry is a very sensitive, highly specific and objective adjuvant tool for the early identification of neoplastic epithelial cells in oral smears.Salivary transcriptome diagnostics for oral cancer detection.Oral fluid (saliva) meets the demand for noninvasive, accessible, and highly efficient diagnostic medium. Recent discovery that a large panel of human RNA can be reliably detected in saliva gives rise to a novel clinical approach, salivary transcriptome diagnostics. The purpose of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic value of this new approach by using oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC) as the proof-of-principle disease.Unstimulated saliva was collected from patients (n = 32) with primary T1/T2 OSCC and normal subjects (n = 32) with matched age, gender, and smoking history. RNA isolation was done from the saliva supernatant, followed by two-round linear amplification with T7 RNA polymerase. Human Genome U133A microarrays were applied for profiling human salivary transcriptome. The different gene expression patterns were analyzed by combining a t test comparison and a fold-change analysis on 10 matched cancer patients and controls. Quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) was used to validate the selected genes that showed significant difference (P < 0.01) by microarray. The predictive power of these salivary mRNA biomarkers was analyzed by receiver operating characteristic curve and classification models.Microarray analysis showed there are 1,679 genes exhibited significantly different expression level in saliva between cancer patients and controls (P < 0.05). Seven cancer-related mRNA biomarkers that exhibited at least a 3.5-fold elevation in OSCC saliva (P < 0.01) were consistently validated by qPCR on saliva samples from OSCC patients (n = 32) and controls (n = 32). These potential salivary RNA biomarkers are transcripts of IL8, IL1B, DUSP1, HA3, OAZ1, S100P, and SAT. The combinations of these biomarkers yielded sensitivity (91%) and specificity (91%) in distinguishing OSCC from the controls.The utility of salivary transcriptome diagnostics is successfully demonstrated in this study for oral cancer detection. This novel clinical approach could be exploited to a robust, high-throughput, and reproducible tool for early cancer detection. Salivary transcriptome profiling can be applied to evaluate its usefulness for other major disease applications as well as for normal health surveillance.[Minimally invasive brush-biopsy: innovative method for early diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma].The aim of this prospective and blinded study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of conventional cytopathology of oral brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions. In addition we checked slide based DNA image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for earliest detection of oral cancer using brush biopsies. Therefore the nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen re-staining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater 9c were observed. Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells thus was 91.3%, specificity for the detection of non-neoplastic cells was 95.1%, positive predictive value 94.4% and negative predictive value 92.3%. The adjuvant DNA image cytometry reached a sensitivity of 97.8%, the specificity and the positive predictive value were 100% and negative predictive value was 98.1%, respectively. Smears from oral brush biopsies of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, minimal invasive, painless and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinomas in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.Evaluation of an autofluorescence based imaging system (VELscope™) in the detection of oral potentially malignant disorders and benign keratoses.Early detection of oral cancer is crucial in improving survival rate. Identification and detection of oral potentially malignant disorders (OPMD) allow delivery of interventions to reduce the evolution of these disorders to malignancy. A variety of new and emerging diagnostic aids and adjunctive techniques are currently available to potentially assist in the detection of OPMD. The objective of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of autofluorescence against conventional oral examination and surgical biopsy. A total of 126 patients, 70 males and 56 females (mean age 58.5±11.9 years) who presented to the Oral Medicine Clinics at King's and Guy's Hospitals, London with oral white and red patches suspicious of OPMD were enrolled. Following a complete visual and autofluorescence examination, all underwent an incisional biopsy for histopathological assessment. Seventy patients had oral leukoplakia/erythroplakia, 32 had oral lichen planus, 9 chronic hyperplastic candidiasis and rest frictional keratosis (13) or oral submucous fibrosis (2). Of 126 lesions, 105 (83%) showed loss of fluorescence. Following biopsy 44 had oral epithelial dysplasia (29 mild, 8 moderate and 7 severe). The sensitivity (se) and specificity (sp) of autofluorescence for the detection of a dysplastic lesion was 84.1% and 15.3% respectively. While VELscope was useful in confirming the presence of oral leukoplakia and erythroplakia and other oral mucosal disorders, the device was unable to discriminate high-risk from low-risk lesions.Fluorescence spectroscopy combined with 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX fluorescence in detecting oral premalignancy.Early detection of premalignant/malignant lesions in the oral cavity can certainly improve the patient's prognosis. This study presents fluorescence imaging with the topical application of 5-aminolevulinic as a way to improve detection of various oral tissue pathologies. This procedure depends mainly on comparing the intensity of red and green fluorescence emitted from tissues during examination.Seventy-one patients who presented with clinically suspicious oral leukoplakia were recruited for this study. Each of the patients was required to have 5-aminolevulinic acid in the form of mouth rinse prior to fluorescence imaging. Following this a surgical biopsy was acquired from the exact examination site. The results of the fluorescence spectroscopy have been compared with histopathology.A Student's t-test was applied to test the viability of the ratio between red and green fluorescence. The red-to-green ratio was found to increase significantly when the lesion was identified as dysplastic or carcinoma in situ. By applying a threshold line to discriminate between normal and dysplastic lesions; a sensitivity of 83-90% and specificity of 79-89% were obtained.Fluorescence spectroscopy combined with 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX was found as a valuable tool in the diagnosis of oral premalignancy. This technique offers the potential to be advantageous over other non-optical techniques in terms of providing real-time diagnosis, in situ monitoring, cost effectiveness and more tolerated by patient compared to surgical biopsy.A pilot case control study on the efficacy of acetic acid wash and chemiluminescent illumination (ViziLite) in the visualisation of oral mucosal white lesions.Conventional screening practice for oral lesions involves visual scrutiny of the oral tissues with the naked eye under projected incandescent or halogen illumination. Visualisation is the principal strategy used to assess patients' lesions at risk for malignant transformation; hence, any procedure which highlights such lesions should aid the clinician. The aim of this pilot study was to examine the efficacy of acetic acid wash and chemiluminescent light (ViziLite) in enhancing visualisation of oral mucosal white lesions, and its ability to highlight malignant and potentially malignant lesions. Fifty five patients referred for assessment of an oral white lesion, were prospectively screened with ViziLite, and an incisional scalpel biopsy performed for a definitive diagnosis. The size, location, ease of visibility, border distinctness, and presence of satellite lesions were recorded. The ViziLite tool enhanced intra-oral visualisation of 26 white lesions. Indeed, all lesions appeared "aceto-white", regardless of the definitive diagnosis. Examination of the oral tissues with ViziLite illumination did not change the provisional diagnosis, nor alter the biopsy site. ViziLite illumination does not discriminate between keratotic, inflammatory, malignant or potentially malignant oral mucosal white lesions and thus, a high index of suspicion, expert clinical judgment, and scalpel biopsy are still essential for proper patient care.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric examination of oral lesions in lichen planus.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA image cytometry applied to oral lesions of lichen planus (LP; n = 56), in order to detect or exclude malignant transformation.Brush and excisional biopsies were obtained from 56 patients. In cases of oral LP in which brush biopsies were suspicious for tumor cells, nuclear DNA contents were measured, using a TV Image Analysis System.In 50 patients EC yielded tumor cell-negative, doubtful in four cases and suspicious results obtained in two cases. DNA image cytometry revealed DNA-aneuploidy only in the two suspicious cases. The comparison between cytologic/DNA-cytometric diagnosis and biopsy histology resulted in a total agreement (LP without dysplasia: 54 and squamous cell carcinoma in LP: two cases).In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific, and non-invasive method, which can be used for periodical follow up of oral LP lesions in order to early detect or exclude malignancy.[Performance of conventional oral brush biopsies].This study evaluated the performance of oral brush biopsies using standard morphological analysis and haematoxylin and eosin (HE) staining for detecting oral squamous cell carcinomas and their respective precursor lesionsBrush biopsies were obtained in 169 consecutive patients who underwent routine biopsies and histological examination for clinically suspicious oral lesions. Air-dried smears were processed by acetone fixation and HE staining. Cytological assessment used well-established criteria of atypia to classify the specimen as either "tumor negative" (no signs of atypia, no malignant cells) or "tumor positive" (malignant cells, any sign of atypia or doubtful cells).Despite a sufficient number of cells, a definite cytological diagnosis could not be established in six cases. According to the criteria specified above, these specimens were classified as "tumor positive." The cytological analysis identified 49 out of 62 oral malignancies (sensitivity 79%). Seven out of 107 benign lesions were classified as false positive (specificity 93%). The positive and negative predictive values were each 88%.Oral brush biopsies will identify only about 80% of oral malignancies when the smears are processed by routine HE stains and are analysed via standard morphological criteria. Thus, this technique should not be used for diagnostic proof or to exclude malignant cells in a lesion suspicious for cancer. However, oral brush biopsy provides a versatile back-up strategy to uncover the true nature of the disease if a lesion is clinically considered benign by mistake.Reliability of toluidine blue vital staining in detection of potentially malignant oral lesions--time to reconsider.Being simple and inexpensive toluidine blue has been in use for more than two decades for the detection of potentially malignant oral lesions (PMOL's) and malignant lesions. Although there has been concensus that staining often assists in the identification of these lesions, results have been diverse. In most studies false negative were not recorded as biopsies of lesions that did not retain toluidine blue were not performed. Thus the present study attempted to evaluate the efficacy of toluidine blue vital dye for detection of PMOL's. The study included 47 biopsies (TBP:35 and TBN:12), of which 23 cases were confirmed as dysplastic (TBP=17 and TBN=6), 7 as hyperkeratosis (TBP=4 and TBN=3), 8 as epithelial hyperplasia (TBP=6 and TBN=3) and 5 as other benign lesions (TBP=4 and TBN=1). The validity test revealed a senstivity of 73.9% and specificity of 30%. The positive predictive value was 54.8% and negative predictive value of 50%. The study intends to highlight the false negative result (26.1%) which was mainly attributed to mild dysplasia and the false positive (32.6%) which included hyperkeratosis, hyperplasia, lichen planus and traumatic ulcer. The study concludes that toluidine blue staining should not blindly direct the clinician's opinion, and strongly discourages the use of toludine blue as a screening test and the results should be interpreted with caution.Diagnostic efficiency of toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine in oral premalignant and malignant lesions.In vivo stains are prompt resources, which have emerged, in the recent years, to aid as clinical diagnostic tools in detecting early premalignant and malignant lesions. The aim of the study was to determine the diagnostic efficiency of toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine in oral premalignancies and malignancies and to evaluate the reliability of in vivo staining with toluidine blue and Lugol's iodine in the lesions at risk of malignancy.The study group comprised 30 subjects with clinically suspicious premalignant lesions and 30 subjects with clinically suspicious malignant lesions. All the lesions were stained consecutively with toluidine blue and Lugol's iodine and the dye retention were recorded with photographs. Depending on the retention of the dyes, the biopsy site was determined. The biopsy specimens were sent for histological confirmation and results were statistically analyzed.The overall diagnostic accuracy of Lugol's iodine when used consecutively with toluidine blue stain in distinguishing premalignant lesions and malignant lesions was 90%. As the degree of differentiation of malignant lesions progressed toward more severity, they failed to show the retention of Lugol's iodine and the result was highly significant statistically, with a P value < 0.001.Lugol's iodine when used with toluidine blue helped in delineating the inflammatory lesions and was the mean source in determining clinically the degrees of differentiation of malignant lesions as the poorly differentiated malignant lesions without glycogen content failed to show Lugol's iodine retention. Toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine can be used as a pretherapeutic assessment of the biologic aggressiveness of the disease.Improving detection of precancerous and cancerous oral lesions. Computer-assisted analysis of the oral brush biopsy. U.S. Collaborative OralCDx Study Group.A study group composed of researchers from across the United States undertook a study to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of OralCDx (OralScan Laboratories Inc.), a computer-assisted method of analysis of the oral brush biopsy, in the detection of precancerous and cancerous lesions of the oral mucosa.The study group conducted a multicenter double-blind study comparing results of OralCDx analysis with those of scalpel biopsy of suspicious oral lesions, as well as using OralCDx on oral lesions that appeared benign clinically.In 945 patients, OralCDx independently detected every case of histologically confirmed oral dysplasia and carcinoma (sensitivity = 100 percent, false-negative rate = 0 percent). Every OralCDx "positive" result was subsequently confirmed by histology as dysplasia or carcinoma. The specificity for the OralCDx "positive" result was 100 percent, while the specificity for the OralCDx "atypical" results was 92.9 percent. In 4.5 percent of clinically benign-appearing lesions that would not have received additional testing or attention other than clinical follow-up, OralCDx uncovered dysplasia or carcinoma (statistical sensitivity > 96 percent, P < .05, n = 131; statistical specificity for the OralCDx "positive" result > 97 percent and for the "atypical" result > 90 percent, P < .05, n = 196).The authors propose that this multicenter trial demonstrates that OralCDx is a highly accurate method of detecting oral precancerous and cancerous lesions. OralCDx can aid in confirming the nature of apparently benign oral lesions and, more significantly, revealing those that are precancerous and cancerous when they are not clinically suspected of being so. All OralCDx "atypical" and "positive" results should be referred for scalpel biopsy and histology to completely characterize the lesion.Given the difficulty in clinically differentiating premalignant and malignant lesions from benign lesions with a similar appearance, OralCDx appears to determine the significance of an oral lesion definitively and detect innocuous-appearing oral cancers at early, curable stages.Cytology of the oral cavity: a re-evaluation.Oral exfoliative cytology, while an economical and practical tool for diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, is not extensively used. The results of conventional (n = 89) and liquid-based (n = 411) oral diagnostic cytology cases are reported and compared to histological diagnosis. Cells were collected using either a Cytobrush device for conventional smears or a dermatological curette (AcuDispo) for liquid-based (Thin Prep) cytology. The "curette technique" allowed for the collection of "accidental" tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies. The sensitivity was 86.5% in conventional and 94.7% in liquid-based cytology; specificity was 94.3% and 98.9%, respectively; inadequate samples were present in 12.4% and 8.8% of cases, respectively. Although conventional cytology may be useful in oral squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, liquid-based cytology gives better results, enhances both the sensitivity and specificity, and also provides material for further investigations, e.g. DNA ploidy studies, microhistology, etc.Improved diagnosis of oral premalignant lesions in submucous fibrosis patients with 5-aminolevulinic acid induced PpIX fluorescence.We investigate the possibility of using ALA-derived PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy for the detection of epithelial hyperkeratosis (EH) or epithelial dysplasia (ED) lesions in oral submucous fibrosis (OSF) patients that could not be found by autofluorescence spectroscopy. Twenty percent of ALA solution gel was applied onto oral neoplasia and surrounding normal tissue [normal oral mucosa (NOM)] for 90 min. Fluorescence emission spectra were measured under 410 nm excitation. Generally, the most intense fluorescence emission peaks occurred at 460 and 630 nm. The ratios of the area under red peak (630+/-10 nm) to the area under blue peak (460+/-10 nm), denoted as RB, were calculated. We found that OSF mucosa has the lowest RB value, followed by NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF. An ANOVA test showed significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (p<0.05). However, measurements of autofluorescence (i.e., before ALA application) show no significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (ANOVA test, p>0.05). These results indicate that ALA-induced PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy could be used to identify the premalignant lesions on oral fibrotic mucosa, which could not be found by autofluorescence.Sensitivity and specificity of oral brush biopsy.The aim of this study was to evaluate the advantage of computer-assisted analysis of the oral brush biopsy compared with synchronous scalpel biopsy in the early detection of oral lesions. In this prospective, randomized, controlled study, brush and scalpel biopsies were performed on 75 patients. Six patients had to be excluded due to inadequate results, and 43 were shown to have dysplastic epithelium, 15 carcinoma, and 11 suspicious lesions. Therefore, the sensitivity for the detection of abnormal cells by means of OralCDx was 52%, specificity 29%, and the positive predictive value 63%. According to our results, the use of oral brush biopsy as a standardized, minimally invasive method of screening oral lesions should be reconsidered.Sensitivity and specificity of OraScan (R) toluidine blue mouthrinse in the detection of oral cancer and precancer.The efficacy of 1% toluidine blue in the identification of oral malignancies and potentially malignant oral lesions was evaluated among a group of Asian patients (n = 102) with undiagnosed oral mucosal lesions and conditions (n = 145). The trial, utilising a ready-to-use kit, was controlled by histopathologic evaluation of a total of 87 dye-retained or dye-negative lesions. Eighteen oral carcinomas all retained the dye and there were no false negatives, yielding a test sensitivity of 100%. Eight of 39 oral epithelial dysplasias were toluidine blue-negative, giving a false negative rate of 20.5% and a sensitivity of 79.5% for oral epithelial dysplasias. The specificity of the technique was low (62%). Five dysplastic lesions were detected solely by the kit and this suggests that the method is valuable for surveillance of high-risk subjects in addition to its remarkable sensitivity in the detection of invasive carcinoma.Diffuse reflection spectroscopy: an alternative to autofluorescence spectroscopy in tongue cancer detection.Laser-induced autofluorescence (LIAF) and diffuse reflection spectroscopy (DRS) are two emerging noninvasive optical tools that have shown immense potential to detect oral cavity pre-cancer. In a recent study, we have used spectral ratio reference standards (SRRS) of LIAF intensity ratios F500/F635, F500/F685, and F500/F705 for grading of tissues belonging to sites other than dorsal side of tongue (DST), lateral side of tongue (LST), and vermillion border of lip (VBL) that exhibited similar spectral shape for normal and abnormal tissues. This led to dismal diagnostic accuracies, and for the three LIAF-SRRS, normal tissue values were often misclassified as squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), which means that the true negatives were being wrongly identified as true positives. This study examines the applicability of the site-specific diffuse reflection spectral intensity ratio (R545/R575) of the oxygenated hemoglobin bands to classify different DST lesions and compares the results obtained with those obtained using LIAF-SRRS. DRS-SRRS of R545/R575 differentiated benign hyperplastic DST tissues from normal tissue with a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 80%, which were indistinguishable using LIAF-SRRS. Further, in distinguishing hyperplastic tissues from premalignant dysplastic lesions, DRS-SRRS gave a sensitivity of 90% and a specificity of 86%, as compared to sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 72% shown by the three LIAF-SRRS together. The diagnostic accuracy and statistical adequacy of the two techniques were assessed by receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC-Curve) analysis. Three LIAF ratios gave a low overall ROC area under curve (ROC-AUCs) of 0.521, whereas the DR ratio (R545/R575) has shown an improved accuracy of 0.970 in differentiating different tissue types. While distinguishing hyperplastic from dysplastic tissues, the DR ratio gave a higher discrimination accuracy of 0.9. Based on these findings, it can be concluded that the DRS-SRRS technique by virtue of its low cost and higher diagnostic accuracies could be a viable alternate to LIAF-SRRS for in vivo screening of tongue pre-cancers and grading of different tissue types.[Toluidine blue solution as a diagnostic aid in oropharyngeal cancer].In the literature exist investigations made to extensive series of patients, with premalignant oral lesions or suspicious of malignancy, in which it has been employed toluidine blue (TB), to verify the trustiness of this method as a resource for support in clinical diagnosis. The results are favourable whenever is observed the correct realization of the technique that must be preceded by a careful buccal exploration and that both findings be corroborated. This work tries to exemplificate one of the techniques of TB as will as the results obtained in 28 patients, whom, for their characteristics were considered of High Risk. Emphasis is made in relation to the false positive found. Besides, is insisted in the convenience of the routine use of this resource in the odontologic private practice and at institutional level in patients over 50 years old, to whom is necessary to accomplish at a time an adequate patient history and an accurate intraoral examination, that in addition to the use of TB, will make feasible to detect more cases of malignant lesions in early stages.Toluidine blue staining and early detection of oral precancerous and malignant lesions.Noninvasive evaluation of oral lesions using depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy.Optical spectroscopy is a noninvasive technique with potential applications for diagnosis of oral dysplasia and early cancer. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic performance of a depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy (DSOS) system for distinguishing dysplasia and carcinoma from non-neoplastic oral mucosa.Patients with oral lesions and volunteers without any oral abnormalities were recruited to participate. Autofluorescence and diffuse reflectance spectra of selected oral sites were measured using the DSOS system. A total of 424 oral sites in 124 subjects were measured and analyzed, including 154 sites in 60 patients with oral lesions and 270 sites in 64 normal volunteers. Measured optical spectra were used to develop computer-based algorithms to identify the presence of dysplasia or cancer. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated using a gold standard of histopathology for patient sites and clinical impression for normal volunteer sites.Differences in oral spectra were observed in: (1) neoplastic versus nonneoplastic sites, (2) keratinized versus nonkeratinized tissue, and (3) shallow versus deep depths within oral tissue. Algorithms based on spectra from 310 nonkeratinized anatomic sites (buccal, tongue, floor of mouth, and lip) yielded an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.96 in the training set and 0.93 in the validation set.The ability to selectively target epithelial and shallow stromal depth regions appeared to be diagnostically useful. For nonkeratinized oral sites, the sensitivity and specificity of this objective diagnostic technique were comparable to that of clinical diagnosis by expert observers. Thus, DSOS has potential to augment oral cancer screening efforts in community settings.The usefulness of toluidine staining as a diagnostic tool for precancerous and cancerous oropharyngeal and oral cavity lesions.Toluidine blue stain is used as a marker to differentiate lesions at high risk of progression in order to improve early diagnosis of oropharyngeal carcinomas. This study focused on 45 oral mucosal lesions in 32 patients (13 female, 19 male). In 9 cases, multiple biopsies were collected. Of the 45 lesions examined, 26 (57.0%) were defined clinically benign, while 19 (42.3%) were defined as suspected lesions (premalignant or malignant). According to the clinical examination, the sensitivity was 53% (16/30) and for toluidine blue staining 96.2% (26/27) (p = 0.0007). The specificity was 80% (12/15) for clinical examination and 77.7% (14/15) for toluidine blue staining (p = 0.79). In conclusion toluidine blue stain has been shown to be a reliable aid when clinical examination is unable to differentiate lesions at high risk of progression and then it improves early diagnosis for oral cavity and oropharyngeal cancer.Reliability of cytologic smear in diagnosis of oral cancer. A controlled study.Laser-induced fluorescence imaging in localization of head and neck cancers.Laser-induced fluorescence tumor imaging exploits the difference in tissue autofluorescence properties between normal and cancerous tissues. The effectiveness and reliability of fluorescence imaging with a lung imaging fluorescence endoscopy (LIFE) system for cancers in the head and neck were compared to those of white light endoscopy (WLE). Examinations by WLE and LIFE were conducted on 25 patients suspected for malignancy. Histologic diagnosis was confirmed by biopsy. Posttreatment evaluations were performed on 6 cancer patients identified by this study. By LIFE, all 16 cancerous lesions, including 2 occult cancers, were identified (100%), while WLE achieved only an 87.5% detection rate. LIFE (specificity 87.5%) was greatly helpful to WLE (specificity 50%) in differentiating inflammation from malignancy, though it failed to exclude granuloma. The results of this study suggest potential roles of LIFE in early detection, correct staging, and treatment evaluation of cancers in the head and neck.Oral fluorescence imaging using 405-nm excitation, aiding the discrimination of cancers and precancers by identifying changes in collagen and elastic breakdown and neovascularization in the underlying stroma.Optical spectroscopy and imaging devices are being developed and tested for the screening and diagnosis of cancer and precancer in multiple organ sites.The aim of the study reported here is to optimize the capability of an optical imaging device to discriminate precancerous tissue from other lesions by identifying ideal excitation wavelengths.The studies reported here used a prototype of a direct fluorescence imaging device that uses 405-nm illumination to excite tissue.There is ample evidence in the literature that 405 nm can distinguish oral cancers from normal tissue. Higher wavelengths may be necessary to differentiate potential confounding lesions, such as abrasions, burns, viral infections, inflammation, and gingivitis.Imaging at 405 nm could help doctors detect precancerous and cancerous oral lesions. Such imaging could be used by dentists, family practitioners, otorhinolaryngologists, general surgeons, obstetrician gynecologists, and internists, and could greatly increase the number of patients who have lesions detected in the precancerous phase.Diagnostic efficiency of differentiating small cancerous and precancerous lesions using mucosal brush smears of the oral cavity--a prospective and blinded study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of oral brush biopsy to identify early malignancy. One hundred and eighty-six brush biopsies of suspicious mucosal lesions were obtained, haematoxilin and eosin (H&E)-stained and compared with the histology of conventional excision biopsies of the same site performed concomitantly. The sensitivity for identifying squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) was 88.5%. High-risk lesions including squamous intraepithelial neoplasia (SIN II, SIN III) and SCC were identified with a sensitivity of 86.4%, using a pap-analogous classification, which is considered to be carcinomatous, as well as moderate and severe dysplastic cells positive. Depending on the cytopathologic definition for malignancy and the tumour size, the test accuracy varied: Extending the cytopathologic criteria for malignancy by defining all dysplastic or malignant cytopathologic findings as positive, the sensitivity was increased to 95.2% at the expense of the specificity, which was reduced from 94.9% to 82.3%. Separately analysing SCCs of less than 20 mm, the sensitivity was reduced by 9.5% to 78%. Although small malignant lesions seem to be less reliable by the conventional oral brush biopsy, it is a useful screening instrument for early diagnosis of suspicious, epithelial lesions and could therefore contribute to improved cancer prognosis.The impact of liquid-based oral cytology on the diagnosis of oral squamous dysplasia and carcinoma.Even though diagnostic oral exfoliative cytology is a useful, economical and practical tool in the diagnosis of oral dysplasia and carcinoma, it is not yet extensively used. The results of conventional exfoliative and liquid-based diagnostic cytology in oral potentially malignant lesions (PML) are herein reported and compared with the histological diagnosis.Either conventional (89) or liquid-based (384) exfoliative cytology was used for the diagnosis of oral dysplasia/carcinoma in 473 subjects and the results were compared with scalpel biopsy histology. Cells were collected using a Cytobrush device for conventional smears and with a dermatological curette for the liquid-based cytology. The 'curette technique' also allowed for the collection of 'accidental' tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies.Histological diagnosis was squamous carcinoma in 96 of 473 cases, high-grade dysplasia (oral intraepithelial neoplasia two to three) in 24 and other lesions in 353 cases. The smears in the conventional cytology group were inadequate in 12.4%, with an 85.7% sensitivity and a 95.9% specificity. There were 8.8% of inadequate specimens in the liquid-based cytology group; sensitivity was 95.1% and specificity was 99.0%.Although conventional cytology is useful when diagnosing oral PML (better sensitivity and predictive positive value if compared with the cervical smear test with similar specificity) and can improve the accuracy of histological diagnosis, liquid-based cytology gives better results, as it not only enhances both sensitivity and specificity, but also provides material for further investigation (AgNORs, DNA, microbiopsies, etc.).Laminin-5 immunocytochemistry: a new tool for identifying dysplastic cells in oral brush biopsies.The brush biopsy technique is not only a seminal technique but also a critically discussed method for detection of oral pre-cancerous stages and manifest carcinomas. The gamma2 chain of laminin-5 and its proteolytic fragments comprise an invasion factor for many carcinomas.The aim of this study was to determine whether the immunocytochemical presentation of the laminin gamma2 chain identifies pre-invasive or invasive squamous cells in brush biopsies.The value-based identification of atypical epithelia was analysed in 93 consecutive brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses: standardized haematoxylin and eosin staining; standardized immunocytochemistry: monoclonal antibodies against laminin gamma2 chain: D4B5, 4G1, detection using ChemMate and Autostainer.Conventional cytology did not result in any false-positive cases, i.e. atypical cells in normal, inflamed or benignly hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity, 100%), whereas immunocytochemistry revealed one false-positive case (specificity, 98%). In brush biopsies of oral squamous cell carcinomas, the following immunocytochemical patterns were possible: (1) staining of the cytoplasm, (2) banded markings between clumped carcinoma cells and (3) positive hazes surrounding atypical cells. Bacterial colonies appeared as false-positive results. Four of 27 carcinomas and one of three recurrences were not cytologically identified (sensitivity of conventional cytology, 79%). Three of the five carcinomas not identified by cytology were immunocytochemically stained with laminin gamma2 chain antibody (sensitivity of laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry, 93%). The positive predictive value was 100% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry. The negative predictive value attained was 92% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry.The high sensitivity level observed for method-enhanced brush cytology suggests that this technique be used as an initial diagnostic step.Utility of toluidine blue as a diagnostic adjunct in the detection of potentially malignant disorders of the oral cavity--a clinical and histological assessment. The value of chairside adjunctive tests in the detection of oral potentially malignant disorders (OPMDs) remains uncertain. To determine the effectiveness of toluidine blue in detecting leukoplakia and erythroplakia and its accuracy in identifying cases with oral epithelial dysplasia. Ninety-two patients attending two oral medicine clinics in London, presenting with white and red patches of the oral mucosa, were investigated by the application of toluidine blue. Eighty-two patients were clinically diagnosed as OPMDs and 10 were frictional keratoses. A surgical biopsy was performed to assess epithelial dysplasia.Of 64 oral leukoplakias, 34 (53.1%) were positive for toluidine blue and among nine erythroplakias seven stained positive. Of 41 oral dysplasia cases, a little more than half of the lesions (n = 23) were stain positive, an estimated sensitivity of 56.1%. TBlue test had a higher sensitivity for detecting higher-grade dysplastic lesions (5/8 moderate dysplasia, sensitivity 62.5%; 5/7 severe dysplasia; sensitivity 71.4%) compared with lower grades of dysplasia, but the differences were not significant (P = 0.60).We report here the utility of TBlue for the detection of oral leukoplakia and erythroplakia. The test has the potential to detect OPMDs and yielded a sensitivity of 56.1% and specificity of 56.9% to detect oral epithelial dysplasia.Detection of squamous cell carcinoma of the oral cavity by imaging 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX fluorescence.Early cancer detection is the best way to improve the prognosis of patients with oral cancer. Therefore this study presents quantitative fluorescence measurements and results in the visualization of cancerous oral mucosa with 5-aminolevulinic acid (5-ALA)-induced protoporphyrin IX (PPIX).Time progression and type of porphyrin accumulation were analyzed in neoplastic and surrounding healthy tissue of 58 patients with a suspected cancer of the oral cavity by measuring emission spectra of 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence. Fluorescence images in the red and green spectral range from the tumor tissue were recorded with a charge-coupled device camera.After topical application of 0.4% 5-ALA and incubation for 1 to 2.5 hours, all patients revealed higher intensities of red fluorescence in neoplastic tissue compared with the surrounding normal tissue. Maximum contrast was reached after 1.5 hours of incubation. In 13.8% (n = 8) of the patients, additional findings like dysplasia, carcinoma in situ, primary tumor, secondary carcinomas, and tumor branches were found by means of fluorescence marking in contrast to white light examination. An evaluation of the biopsy specimens resulted in a specificity of 60% and a sensitivity of 99%.As a fluorescent marker, PPIX could represent a possible new diagnostic tool to detect early malignant and secondary lesions in the oral cavity. In addition, 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence is promising as a useful intraoperative tool for determining adequate surgical margins of resection. Further investigations aim to assess this diagnostic procedure as a sensitive and clinically reliable method for patients with oral cancer.Effectiveness of autofluorescence to identify suspicious oral lesions--a prospective, blinded clinical trial.Regular screening through white light inspection of the entire oral mucosa is the most important examination method to identify precancerous lesions and early oral carcinoma. Additionally, the physiologic autofluorescence of the oral mucosa has been described as a novel screening method for the detection of mucosal lesions that are not visible by white light. This study aimed to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the autofluorescence examination. Seventy-eight patients were examined in this study. All of them suffered from suspicious oral mucosal lesions. Two different investigation methods were applied: the standard examination by white light and an examination by a novel light source of 400 nm that evoked a green light emission (>500 nm) in normal mucosa. It was proposed that malignant oral mucosal lesions show different autofluorescence characteristics than the green autofluorescence of healthy mucosa. Red autofluorescence indicated SCC with a sensitivity of 20% and a specificity of 98%. The results showed that dysplasia and carcinoma could be identified with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 18% by using the autofluorescence method. The sensitivity decreased according to the grade of mucosal keratosis and was influenced by the localisation of the lesion. In conclusion, benign as well as malignant oral lesions could not be distinguished by a diminished autofluorescence signal. A red autofluorescence signal, however, could indicate cancerous processes of the oral mucosa.Comparison of computer-assisted brush biopsy results with follow up scalpel biopsy and histology.Oral brush biopsy results were compared with scalpel biopsy and histology to determine the positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy finding. Of 243 patients with abnormal brush biopsies, 93 proved positive for dysplasia (79) or carcinoma (14) and 150 were negative for either dysplasia or carcinoma. Therefore, the positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy was 38% (93/243). By using the oral brush biopsy, dentists can inform their patients that abnormal findings have a strong positive predictive value for dysplasia or carcinoma and therefore require follow-up confirmation by scalpel biopsy.The use of an oral brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis in the evaluation of oral lesions: a study of 94 patients.The objective of this study was to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of modified brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis in the detection of oral premalignant and malignant lesions.Ninety-four patients attending outpatient clinics who exhibited oral lesions suspicious of premalignancy or malignancy were enrolled. All patients underwent an oral brush biopsy using a baby toothbrush followed by a scalpel biopsy. The specimens were analyzed manually in a double-blinded fashion. Sensitivity and specificity were used for the statistical analysis of the samples. Statistical significance was determined using the normal approximation to the binomial distribution of matched results, approximated by the Student t distribution mean test (paired t test).Seventy-nine patients with adequate transepithelial brush biopsy samples were included in the study group. When compared to scalpel biopsy, the statistical sensitivity of the brush biopsy was greater than 76.8% (P < .05) while the statistical specificity was greater than 93.3% (P < .05). There were 4 false negative brush biopsy cases. The 4 false negative patients turned out to be dysplasia/ malignancy on histopathology. All 4 were patients with clinical oral submucous fibrosis.The oral brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis was found to be a painless, noninvasive test for evaluating oral lesions. The toothbrush brush biopsy with manual analysis had much [corrected] lower sensitivity and specificity than the commercially available oral brush biopsy with computer-assisted analysis. The results demonstrate that by using a toothbrush to obtain an oral brush biopsy sample, oral lesions can be easily evaluated in a resource challenged settings to rule out dysplasia and carcinoma.An audit of the efficacy of the oral brush biopsy technique in a specialist Oral Medicine unit.The diagnosis of oral epithelial dysplasia has traditionally been based upon histopathological evaluation of a full thickness biopsy specimen from lesional tissue. It has recently been proposed that cytological examination of "brush biopsy" samples is a non-invasive method of determining the presence of cellular atypia, and hence the likelihood of oral epithelial dysplasia. The present audit determined, retrospectively the sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the oral brush biopsy technique in the diagnosis of potentially malignant disease in a group of 112 patients attending a specialist Oral Medicine unit. The sensitivity of detection of oral epithelial dysplasia or squamous cell carcinoma of the oral brush biopsy system was 71.4% while the specificity was 32%. The positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy result (positive or atypical) was 44.1%, while the negative predictive value was 60%. It is concluded that not all potentially malignant disease is detected with this non-invasive investigative procedure.The sensitivity and specificity of the OralCDx technique: evaluation of 103 cases.In this study, we compared 103 OralCDx results with the histological findings of 96 clinical sites in 80 patients (33 females; 64.3+/-13.7 years and 47 males; 53.2+/-11.5 years). The histological findings were classified as follows: compatible with oral leukoplakia (OL; n = 60) or oral lichen planus (OLP; n = 17), both without dysplasia; dysplasia in OL or OLP (n = 9); and oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC; n = 17). There were seven (6.8%) specimens with an inadequate cell count. Overall, the sensitivity of the OralCDx technique to detect dysplasia and OSCC was 92.3% (95% CI: 74.9-99.1%), and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI: 86.0-98.4%). The positive likelihood ratio (LR+) was 16.2 (95% CI: 6.2-42.1) and the negative likelihood ratio (LR-) was 0.08 (95% CI: 0.02-0.31). In conclusion, these figures are in agreement with previously published data and support the use of OralCDx as a screening tool of oral lesions, but further trials are still necessary.A comparative study of normal inspection, autofluorescence and 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence for oral cancer diagnosis.Fluorescence diagnosis aims to improve the management of oral cancer via early detection of the malignant lesions and better delimitation of the tumor margins. This paper presents a comparative study of normal inspection, combined fluorescence diagnosis (CFD) and its 2 main components, autofluorescence and 5-aminolevulinic acid (5-ALA)-induced protoporphyrin IX (PPIX) fluorescence. Biopsy-controlled fluorescence imaging and spectral analysis were performed on a total of 85 patients with suspected or histologically proven oral carcinoma both before and after topical administration of 5-ALA (200 mg 5-ALA dissolved in 50 ml of H(2)0). Fluorescence excitation was accomplished using filtered light of a xenon short arc lamp (lambda = 375-440 nm). As for CFD, a "streetlight" contrast (red to green) was readily found between malignant and healthy tissue on the acquired images. In terms of tumor localization and delimitation properties, CFD was clearly favorable over either normal inspection or its 2 components in fluorescence imaging. The performance of CFD was found to be impeded by tumor keratinization but to be independent of either tumor staging, grading or localization. In spectral analysis, cancerous tissue showed significantly higher PPIX fluorescence intensities and lower autofluorescence intensities than normal mucosa. There is a great potential for CFD in early detection of oral neoplasms and exact delimitation of the tumors' superficial margins and an advantage over white light inspection and each of its 2 main components. The method is noninvasive, safe and easily reproducible.The assessment of diffused light illumination and acetic acid rinse (Microlux/DL) in the visualisation of oral mucosal lesions.Oral examination alone cannot always distinguish benign from premalignant and malignant lesions, thereby resulting in delayed patient referral and poorer prognosis. Thus, any non-invasive technology which highlights oral premalignant and malignant lesions in a highly sensitive and specific manner will undoubtedly aid clinicians in early diagnosis and treatment of these conditions. The aim of this study was to assess the efficacy of acetic acid mouthwash and diffused light illumination (Microlux/DL) as a diagnostic aid in the visualisation of oral mucosal lesions and its ability to highlight malignant and potentially malignant lesions. Fifty patients referred for assessment of an oral white lesion were initially examined under routine incandescent operatory light. The location, size, ease of visibility, border distinctness and presence of satellite lesions were recorded. Clinical examination was repeated using the Microlux/DL diffused light illumination kit. An incisional biopsy was performed to provide a definitive histopathological diagnosis. Microlux/DL examination enhanced the visibility of 34 lesions, however, it did not help uncover any clinically undetected lesions, change the provisional diagnosis, or alter the biopsy site. Microlux/DL showed a sensitivity of 77.8% and a specificity of 70.7%, with a positive predictive value of 36.8%. Although Microlux/DL appears useful at enhancing lesion visibility, it is a poor discriminator for inflammatory, traumatic and malignant lesions.[Noninvasive brush biopsy as an innovative tool for early detection of oral carcinomas].The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of DNA image cytometry in combination with non-invasive brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions.Cytological diagnoses obtained from 1328 exfoliative smears of 332 different lesions were compared with histology and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally, nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater than 9c were observed. RESULTS; The sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in addition to DNA image cytometry on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 97.8%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, and negative predictive value 98.1%.The application of DNA image cytometry with DNA aneuploidy as a marker for neoplastic transformation in oral smears secures cytologic diagnosis of carcinomas. Smears from brushings of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, noninvasive, painless, and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective, and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.RELIABILITY OF ORAL EXFOLIATIVE CYTOLOGY FOR DETECTION OF ORAL CANCER.High-molecular tenascin-C as an indicator of atypical cells in oral brush biopsies.Tumour-invasion like wound healing is characterised by the formation of an extracellular matrix with a high tenascin-C content. The tenascin-C molecule undergoes alternative splicing. Analysis using antibody BC2 indicates that especially the high-molecular tenascin-C (hm tn-C) variants are typically tumour-associated, while distribution in normal tissue is restrictive. This study investigated whether hm tn-C is a suitable indicator of atypical cells with invasive potential in oral brush biopsies. One hundred fifty nine consecutive oral brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses were analysed for the identification of atypical cells. A standardised haematoxylin and eosin staining plus standardised immunocytochemistry using the monoclonal anti-hm tn-C antibody was performed. The bound hm tn-C antibodies were detected with the streptavidine/alkaline phosphatase technique in the autostainer. Conventional cytology produced four false-positives when identifying atypical cells in brush biopsies of inflammatory/benign hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity 96%), while 10 in 52 carcinomas and three of eight recurrences were not identified (sensitivity 78%). Ten of these 13 non-identified tumours could be marked when adding the hm tn-C assay (increasing specificity to 99%). Combining the two assays also reduced the false-positive outcomes from four to one (increasing sensitivity to 95%). The positive and negative predictive values were 92 and 88% for conventional cytology vs 98 and 97% for the dual assay. (1) A 95%-sensitivity proves hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to be a suitable means of identifying atypical cells in oral brush biopsies. (2) The positive (98%) and negative (97%) predictive values obtained approximate hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to laminin-5 (100/97%).A cross-sectional study evaluating chemiluminescence and autofluorescence in the detection of clinically innocuous precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.ViziLite Plus with TBlue system (Zila Pharmaceuticals; now Zila, a division of Tolmar, Fort Collins, Colo.) and VELscope (LED Dental, White Rock, British Columbia, Canada) are oral cancer screening aids that have been developed to assist dentists in identifying precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.The authors screened patients with an overhead examination light and then with VELscope or ViziLite. Patients with a clinically innocuous lesion underwent a biopsy, and the authors compared the results of tissue pathological analysis with findings from the screening aid tests to determine the sensitivity and specificity of each device. The authors tested these devices to determine their ability to aid in the decision-making process regarding whether further evaluation of a clinically innocuous lesion was required.The authors examined 102 lesions with ViziLite and then biopsied them [corrected]. They found three dysplasias and one malignancy, none of which were detected with the ViziLite (sensitivity = 0 percent, confidence interval [CI] = 0-60.2 percent; specificity = 75.5 percent, CI = 66.7-82.8 percent). The authors examined another 156 lesions with VELscope and then biopsied them [corrected].They found 11 dysplasias and one malignancy, six of which were detected with VELscope (sensitivity = 50 percent, CI = 21.1-78.9 percent; specificity = 38.9 percent, CI = 30.8-46.9 percent).The study results indicate that use of ViziLite or VELscope along with a conventional screening examination for lesions deemed clinically innocuous was not beneficial in identifying dysplasia or cancer. Additional clinical studies are needed before these devices can be recommended.Clinicians and patients could have a false sense of security after obtaining a negative ViziLite or VELscope examination result because potentially large numbers of precancerous and cancerous lesions will be missed by both devices.The use of the PAPNET automated cytological screening system for the diagnosis of oral squamous carcinoma.The automated PAPNET screening system has been developed to recognize abnormal cells in cervical smears. Given that the oral mucosa sheds cells resembling superficial and intermediate cells of the cervix, the aim of this study was to assess whether the PAPNET system could be used to detect dysplastic cells in oral mucosal smears. Sixty-two oral smears from 27 patients were examined by both light microscopy and using the PAPNET system from clinically abnormal and normal areas by two pathologists. The clinically abnormal sites were also biopsied for histological analysis. There was 100% correlation between the manual and PAPNET screening results. Cytological interpretation of oral smears by both manual and PAPNET screening methods correctly diagnosed squamous cell carcinoma in 14/23 (61%) of patients who had all been confirmed by biopsy. The nine patients with false-negative cases could be attributed to poor smear technique and preparation. The PAPNET system can be used to identify abnormal cells in oral smears and, as such, may have an application for screening those populations at high risk of oral cancer--provided that adequate tuition is given in smear technique.Noninvasive fluorescence excitation spectroscopy for the diagnosis of oral neoplasia in vivo.Fluorescence excitation spectroscopy (FES) is an emerging approach to cancer detection. The goal of this pilot study is to evaluate the diagnostic potential of FES technique for the detection and characterization of normal and cancerous oral lesions in vivo. Fluorescence excitation (FE) spectra from oral mucosa were recorded in the spectral range of 340 to 600 nm at 635 nm emission using a fiberoptic probe spectrofluorometer to obtain spectra from the buccal mucosa of 30 sites of 15 healthy volunteers and 15 sites of 10 cancerous patients. Significant FE spectral differences were observed between normal and well differentiated squamous cell carcinoma (WDSCC) oral lesions. The FE spectra of healthy volunteers consists of a broad emission band around 440 to 470 nm, whereas in WDSCC lesions, a new primary peak was seen at 410 nm with secondary peaks observed at 505, 540, and 580 nm due to the accumulation of porphyrins in oral lesions. The FE spectral bands of the WDSCC lesions resemble the typical absorption spectra of a porphyrin. Three potential ratios (I410/I505, I410/I540, and I410/I580) were calculated from the FE spectra and used as input variables for a stepwise linear discriminant analysis (SLDA) for normal and WDSCC groups. Leave-one-out (LOO) method of cross-validation was performed to check the reliability on spectral data for tissue characterization. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity were determined for normal and WDSCC lesions from the scatter plot of the discriminant function scores. It was observed that diagnostic algorithm based on discriminant function scores obtained by SLDA-LOO method was able to distinguish WDSCC from normal lesions with a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 100%. Results of the pilot study demonstrate that the FE spectral changes due to porphyrin have a good diagnostic potential; therefore, porphyrin can be used as a native tumor marker.Use of methylene blue as a diagnostic aid in early detection of oral cancer and precancerous lesions.We assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value of methylene blue staining in the diagnosis of oral cancer in 58 patients. The sensitivity was 90%, the specificity 69%, positive predictive value 74%, and negative predictive value 87%. Because of the number of false negatives and false positives we recommend that the diagnosis should always be confirmed by histopathological examination of a biopsy specimen. Methylene blue staining may, however, be useful as a screening tool for oral cancer in large, high-risk groups in a similar way to the more expensive toluidine blue.Clinical evaluation of an autofluorescence diagnostic device for oral cancer detection: a prospective randomized diagnostic study.The prognosis for patients with oral squamous cell carcinoma remains poor despite advances in multimodal treatment concepts. Early diagnosis and treatment is the key to improved patient survival. A device (VELscope) that uses autofluorescence technology, allowing direct fluorescence visualization of the oral cavity, might be a useful tool for oral cancer detection or as an adjunct to standard clinical examination. A total of 289 patients with oral premalignant lesions were randomly divided into two groups for clinical examination of precancerous oral lesions. In group 1, 166 patients were examined conventionally with white light, and in group 2, 123 patients were examined with the autofluorescence visualization device (VELscope) in addition to the white light examination. Biopsies were obtained from all suspicious areas identified in both examination groups (n=52). In the first step, baseline characteristics of the two groups (only white light vs. white light and VELscope) were compared to exclude selection bias. In the second step, for the group examined with white light and VELscope (123 patients), the diagnostic strategies were compared with regard to sensitivity and specificity using biopsy as the gold standard. The results showed that using the VELscope leads to higher sensitivity (100% instead of 17%), but to lower specificity (74% instead of 97%). Thus, we can conclude that the VELscope is a useful new diagnostic device for detection of oral cancer diseases.The utility of toluidine blue staining and brush cytology as adjuncts in clinical examination of suspicious oral mucosal lesions.The objective of this study was to investigate the utility of toluidine blue and brush cytology in patients with clinically detected oral mucosal lesions. Clinical examination of 35 patients was completed before toluidine blue application, oral brush cytology and scalpel biopsy. Lesions were photographed before and after stain application; followed by brush cytology. All findings were compared with histopathologic results. Severe dysplasia and carcinoma-in-situ were determined as 'positive'; no dysplasia and mild to moderate dysplasia were defined as 'negative'. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of clinical examination and toluidine blue were the same: 0.923, 0.433, 0.414, and 0.929, respectively. Those of brush cytology were 0.923, 0.517, 0.462, and 0.938. The concordance of all methods was 30% for benign and 61% for malignant lesions. Adjuncts identified 92% of carcinoma-in-situ and squamous cell carcinoma as confirmed by histopathology, in contrast to clinical findings alone in which 62% of these lesions were identified (p=0.046). In conclusion, adjunct diagnostic methods decreased the level of uncertainty for the diagnosis of oral malignancies and lichenoid dysplasias when applied as adjuncts to clinical examination.A study to evaluate the efficacy of toluidine blue and cytology in detecting oral cancer and dysplastic lesions.Recent advances in techniques for detecting oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma have improved the chances of early diagnosis. Adjuncts for detection of lesions include toluidine blue staining and cytologic examination. The primary objective of this study was to assess the efficacy of 1% toluidine blue (modified Mashberg technique) and cytology in detection of oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma.The study included 86 participants suspected of having oral premalignant lesions or oral squamous cell carcinoma. One percent toluidine blue was applied to the lesions, followed by cytology. A biopsy was then performed on the tissue. Histopathologically proven oral premalignant lesions/oral squamous cell carcinoma lesions were analyzed for sensitivity, specificity, postive predictive value, and negative predictive value of both screening techniques. The association of screening techniques and histopathologic diagnosis among the oral premalignant lesions, oral squamous cell carcinoma, and benign groups were analyzed using the Fisher exact test. P < .05 was considered significant.The specificity and sensitivity for oral squamous cell carcinoma and oral premalignant lesions detection of 1% toluidine blue was 81.35% and 66.67%, respectively, while cytology attained 77.97% and 70.37%, respectively. Negative predictive value and positive predictive value were 84.21% and 62.06% for 1% toluidine blue and 85.18% and 59.37% for cytologic examination, respectively. Comparison of 1% toluidine blue and cytology with histopathologic diagnosis shows a significant difference between carcinoma/epithelial dysplasia and no dysplasia and carcinoma/epithelial dysplasia and benign lesions (all, P < .05).The results of this study suggest that 1% toluidine blue and cytology have high sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in detecting oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma and can be used as an adjunct for early detection of such lesions.Analysis of oral lesion biopsies identified and evaluated by visual examination, chemiluminescence and toluidine blue.Conventional visual examination and palpation remains the gold-standard for the identification of oral mucosal lesions. The purpose of this study was to investigate the adjunctive value of a chemiluminescent light source (ViziLite, Zila Pharmaceuticals, Phoenix, Arizona) and application of pharmaceutical grade toluidine blue (TBlue(630), Zila Pharmaceuticals, Phoenix, Arizona) to further assess lesions identified during the conventional oral soft tissue examination. Lesions deemed clinically suspicious by visual examination under incandescent light were further assessed under chemiluminescence and then application of toluidine blue stain. Differences between the conventional visual examination and chemiluminescent examination were noted on four characteristics which may aid in lesion identification. Tissue retention of toluidine blue stain was documented. Each suspicious lesion was biopsied and diagnosed based upon routine histopathology. Both adjunctive exams were evaluated by comparing the histologic diagnosis. The additive value of toluidine blue stain retention was assessed in lesions diagnosed as "serious pathology" defined as severe dysplasia, carcinoma in situ and squamous cell carcinoma. Ninety-seven clinically suspicious lesions in 84 patients were identified. The chemiluminescent exam improved the brightness and/or sharpness of margin in 61.8% of identified lesions. Biopsied lesions with toluidine blue stain retention reduced the false positive rate by 55.26% while maintaining a 100% negative predictive value (NPV). Chemiluminescence was shown to increase the brightness and margins of mucosal lesions in a majority of cases and therefore may assist in identification of mucosal lesions not considered under traditional visual examination. Toluidine blue stain retention was associated with a large reduction in biopsies showing benign histology (false positive biopsy results), while maintaining a 100% NPV for the presence of severe dysplasia or cancer. Practitioners may consider use of these adjuncts in practice, however the results presented are based upon experienced providers in referral centers for mucosal disease or cancer centers and therefore positive findings may be an indication for referral to experienced providers.Comparison of the Cytobrush®, dermatological curette and oral CDx® brush test as methods for obtaining samples of RNA for molecular analysis of oral cytology.Interest in oral exfoliative cytology has increased with the availability of molecular markers that may lead to the earlier diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma. This research aims to compare the efficacy of three different instruments (Cytobrush, curette and Oral CDx brush) in providing adequate material for molecular analysis.One hundred and four cytological samples obtained from volunteer healthy subjects were analysed using all three instruments. The clinical and demographical variables under study were age, sex and smoking habits. The three instruments were compared for their ability to obtain adequate samples and for the amount of RNA obtained using quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR-qRT) analysis of the Abelson (ABL) housekeeping gene.RNA of the ABL gene has been quantified by number of copies. Adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with a curette (90.6%) or Oral CDx (80.0%) than a Cytobrush (48.6%); P < 0.001. Similarly, the RNA quantification was 17.64 ± 21.10 with a curette, 16.04 ± 15.81 with Oral CDx and 6.82 ± 6.71 with a Cytobrush. There were statistically significant differences between the Cytobrush and curette (P = 0.008) and between the Cytobrush and OralCDx (P = 0.034). There was no difference according to the demographical variables.Oral exfoliative cytology is a simple, non-invasive technique that provides sufficient RNA to perform studies on gene expression. Although material was obtained with all three instruments, adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with the curette or Oral CDx than with a Cytobrush. The Oral CDx is a less aggressive instrument than the curette, so could be a useful tool in a clinical setting.Diagnostic value of nucleolar organizer regions (AgNORs) in brush biopsies of suspicious lesions of the oral cavity.The aim of this retrospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of AgNOR-analysis as an adjunctive diagnostic tool of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from suspicious lesions in our clinic.Cytological diagnoses obtained from brush biopsies of macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa from 75 patients (final diagnoses: 53 histologically proven squamous cell carcinomas, 11 leukoplakias and other inflammatory oral lesions) and from 11 patients with normal mucosa as a negative control group were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups. Five smears were doubtful and seven suspicious for tumor cells in the cytologic report. Number of AgNOR's were counted in 100 squamous epithelial cell-nuclei per slide after silver-restaining.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis alone on oral smears for the detection of squamous carcinomas was 92.5%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value was 100% and negative 84.6%. The best cut-off value of the mean number of AgNOR dots per nucleus distinguishing benign from malignant cells was 4.8. The percentage of nuclei with more than three AgNORs had a cut-off level of 70%. Applying these methods to twelve doubtful or suspicious cytological diagnoses we were able to correctly establish the diagnosis of malignancy in ten cases of histologically proven cancers and to reveal benignity in two histologically proven cases. Thus we achieved a positive and negative predictive value of 100% each.Smears from brushings of visible oral lesions, if clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral cancerous lesions. We conclude that AgNOR-analysis may be a useful adjunct to other methods in routine cytological diagnosis of oral cancer that can help to solve cytologically suspicious or doubtful cases.Utility of toluidine blue staining and brush biopsy in precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.To evaluate the usefulness of toluidine blue and brush biopsy in precancerous oral lesions and squamous cell carcinoma.The study was conducted at Moti Lal Nehru Medical College, Allahabad, India. Ninety-six patients with suspicious oral lesions who attended the outpatient clinics of otorhinolaryngology were screened with in vivo toluidine blue staining and oral brush biopsy.Oral brush biopsy showed high specificity and sensitivity. Toluidine blue staining was highly sensitive and moderately specific for malignant lesions but less sensitive for premalignant lesions.Early detection of oral carcinoma is possible even at the precancerous stages by using noninvasive, painless and outpatient procedures, such as in vivo toluidine blue staining and brush biopsy.Assessment of oral premalignancy using elastic scattering spectroscopy.Optical spectroscopy systems have been involved in various clinical fields; however the main interest is still in the diagnosis of premalignant/malignant lesions. The aim of this study was to compare findings of Elastic Scattering Spectroscopy (ESS) with histopathology of oral tissues to see if this technique could be used as an adjunct or alternative to histopathology in identifying dysplasia. The technique involves the use of Mie scattering and is a simple non-invasive method of tissue interrogation. Twenty-five oral sites from 25 patients who presented with oral leukoplakia were examined by ESS using a pulsed xenon-arc lamp. Surgical biopsies were acquired from each of the examination sites. The results of the acquired spectra were then compared with histopathology. Two sets of spectra were obtained, and by using a linear discriminant analysis, a sensitivity of 72% and a specificity of 75% were obtained. These results are promising and could suggest that ESS may be able to identify dysplasia in oral tissues. To prove the usefulness of the ESS in dysplasia detection in oral tissues conclusively, a larger body of data is needed. We aim to continue this study to obtain more data in an attempt to increase the accuracy of the technique. Large, multi-centre trails are needed for each anatomical site, in order to gather more information about the differences between normal and dysplastic tissue.Low positive predictive value of the oral brush biopsy in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.The authors evaluated the effectiveness of the oral brush biopsy technique as a diagnostic tool in detecting dysplastic oral lesions.In this cross-sectional study, pathologic reports (n = 152) from the scalpel biopsies (tissue samples) in patients who previously tested either "positive" (n = 3) or "atypical" (n = 149) for dysplasia by brush biopsy (OralCDx) were evaluated. Information on the age and sex of the patient, the site of the lesion, the brush biopsy results, and the histopathologic diagnosis of the scalpel biopsy was collected. The positive predictive values (PPVs) for "abnormal," "atypical," and "positive" brush biopsies were determined.Overall, the PPV of an abnormal brush biopsy was only 7.9% (95% confidence interval [CI], 4.2%-13.4%), and the PPV of an "atypical" brush biopsy was 7.4% (95% CI, 3.7%-12.8%). Of the 3 positive brush biopsies, only 1 was identified as dysplastic. The proportion of false-positive biopsy results was as high as 92.1% (95% CI, 86.6%-95.9%).The OralCDx technique overestimated dysplastic lesions and produced a high number of false-positive results.Multi-class classification algorithm for optical diagnosis of oral cancer.We report development of a direct multi-class spectroscopic diagnostic algorithm for discrimination of high-grade cancerous tissue sites from low-grade as well as precancerous and normal squamous tissue sites of human oral cavity. The algorithm was developed making use of the recently formulated theory of total principal component regression (TPCR). The in vivo autofluorescence spectral data acquired from patients screened for neoplasm of oral cavity at the Government Cancer Hospital, Indore, was used to train and validate the algorithm. The diagnostic algorithm based on TPCR was found to provide satisfactory performance in classifying the tissue sites in four different classes - high-grade squamous cell carcinoma, low-grade squamous cell carcinoma, leukoplakia, and normal squamous tissue. The classification accuracy for these four classes was observed to be approximately 94%, 100%, 100% and 91% for the training data set (based on leave-one-out cross-validation), and was approximately 90%, 90%, 85% and 88%, respectively for the corresponding classes for the independent validation data set.Usefulness of fluorescence photography for diagnosis of oral cancer.This study was carried out to evaluate the validity of fluorescence photography as an adjunctive diagnostic method for oral cancer. Fluorescence photography was performed on 130 oral lesions in 130 patients. Lesions showing red, orange or pink fluorescence on the photographs were defined as positive, while all other lesions were considered negative. Seventy-two (91.1%) of 79 carcinomas and 6 (85.7%) of 7 epithelial dysplasias were judged as positive, whereas two (4.5%) of 44 benign lesions that were not dysplasias showed positive fluorescence. Sixty-nine (94.5%) of 73 squamous cell carcinomas showed positive fluorescence. These results suggest that fluorescence photography is useful as an adjunctive diagnostic method for oral squamous cell carcinoma.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric very early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA-image cytometry applied to suspicious oral lesions compared with synchronous histology.Brush- and scalpel biopsies were obtained from 98 patients with suspicious oral lesions. In cases, in which EC revealed malignant or suspicious cells, nuclear DNA-contents were measured using a TV image analysis system.Among 98 oral lesions both cytological and histological diagnosis showed no sign of malignancy or dysplasia in 75. In 23 cases cytology yielded tumor cell-positive (15), suspicious (four) or doubtful (four) results. DNA-cytometry showed aneuploidy in 19 of these. The comparison between cytological diagnosis combined with DNA-cytometry and biopsy-histology resulted in a sensitivity of 100% and a specificity of 97.4%.In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific and non-invasive method for the early diagnosis of oral epithelial neoplasia, showing excellent compliance among patients.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric early diagnosis of oral cancer.The aim of this prospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from white-spotted, ulcerated or other suspicious oral lesions in our clinic. In addition we checked DNA-image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA-aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for the early identification of tumor cells in oral brushings.251 cytological diagnoses obtained from exfoliative smears of 181 patients from macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa and from clinically seemingly benign oral lesions which were excised for establishing histological diagnoses were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally nuclear DNA-contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 94.6%, specificity 99.5%, positive predictive value 98.1% and negative predictive value 98.5%. DNA-aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA-stemlines or cells with DNA-content greater 9c were observed. On this basis the prevalence of DNA-aneuploidy in smears of oral squamous cell carcinomas in situ or invasive carcinomas was 96.4%. Sensitivity of DNA-aneuploidy in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 96.4%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100% and negative 99.0%. The combination of both techniques increased the sensitivity to 98.2%, specificity to 100%, positive predictive value to 100% and negative to 99.5%.Brush cytology of all visible oral lesions, if they are clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, cheap, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions, carcinoma in situ or invasive squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA-image cytometry is a very sensitive, highly specific and objective adjuvant tool for the early identification of neoplastic epithelial cells in oral smears.Salivary transcriptome diagnostics for oral cancer detection.Oral fluid (saliva) meets the demand for noninvasive, accessible, and highly efficient diagnostic medium. Recent discovery that a large panel of human RNA can be reliably detected in saliva gives rise to a novel clinical approach, salivary transcriptome diagnostics. The purpose of this study is to evaluate the diagnostic value of this new approach by using oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC) as the proof-of-principle disease.Unstimulated saliva was collected from patients (n = 32) with primary T1/T2 OSCC and normal subjects (n = 32) with matched age, gender, and smoking history. RNA isolation was done from the saliva supernatant, followed by two-round linear amplification with T7 RNA polymerase. Human Genome U133A microarrays were applied for profiling human salivary transcriptome. The different gene expression patterns were analyzed by combining a t test comparison and a fold-change analysis on 10 matched cancer patients and controls. Quantitative polymerase chain reaction (qPCR) was used to validate the selected genes that showed significant difference (P < 0.01) by microarray. The predictive power of these salivary mRNA biomarkers was analyzed by receiver operating characteristic curve and classification models.Microarray analysis showed there are 1,679 genes exhibited significantly different expression level in saliva between cancer patients and controls (P < 0.05). Seven cancer-related mRNA biomarkers that exhibited at least a 3.5-fold elevation in OSCC saliva (P < 0.01) were consistently validated by qPCR on saliva samples from OSCC patients (n = 32) and controls (n = 32). These potential salivary RNA biomarkers are transcripts of IL8, IL1B, DUSP1, HA3, OAZ1, S100P, and SAT. The combinations of these biomarkers yielded sensitivity (91%) and specificity (91%) in distinguishing OSCC from the controls.The utility of salivary transcriptome diagnostics is successfully demonstrated in this study for oral cancer detection. This novel clinical approach could be exploited to a robust, high-throughput, and reproducible tool for early cancer detection. Salivary transcriptome profiling can be applied to evaluate its usefulness for other major disease applications as well as for normal health surveillance.[Minimally invasive brush-biopsy: innovative method for early diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma].The aim of this prospective and blinded study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of conventional cytopathology of oral brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions. In addition we checked slide based DNA image cytometry as an adjuvant diagnostic tool. Our hypothesis is that DNA aneuploidy is a sensitive and specific marker for earliest detection of oral cancer using brush biopsies. Therefore the nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen re-staining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater 9c were observed. Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in oral smears for the detection of cancer cells thus was 91.3%, specificity for the detection of non-neoplastic cells was 95.1%, positive predictive value 94.4% and negative predictive value 92.3%. The adjuvant DNA image cytometry reached a sensitivity of 97.8%, the specificity and the positive predictive value were 100% and negative predictive value was 98.1%, respectively. Smears from oral brush biopsies of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, minimal invasive, painless and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinomas in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.Evaluation of an autofluorescence based imaging system (VELscope™) in the detection of oral potentially malignant disorders and benign keratoses.Early detection of oral cancer is crucial in improving survival rate. Identification and detection of oral potentially malignant disorders (OPMD) allow delivery of interventions to reduce the evolution of these disorders to malignancy. A variety of new and emerging diagnostic aids and adjunctive techniques are currently available to potentially assist in the detection of OPMD. The objective of the present study was to evaluate the accuracy of autofluorescence against conventional oral examination and surgical biopsy. A total of 126 patients, 70 males and 56 females (mean age 58.5±11.9 years) who presented to the Oral Medicine Clinics at King's and Guy's Hospitals, London with oral white and red patches suspicious of OPMD were enrolled. Following a complete visual and autofluorescence examination, all underwent an incisional biopsy for histopathological assessment. Seventy patients had oral leukoplakia/erythroplakia, 32 had oral lichen planus, 9 chronic hyperplastic candidiasis and rest frictional keratosis (13) or oral submucous fibrosis (2). Of 126 lesions, 105 (83%) showed loss of fluorescence. Following biopsy 44 had oral epithelial dysplasia (29 mild, 8 moderate and 7 severe). The sensitivity (se) and specificity (sp) of autofluorescence for the detection of a dysplastic lesion was 84.1% and 15.3% respectively. While VELscope was useful in confirming the presence of oral leukoplakia and erythroplakia and other oral mucosal disorders, the device was unable to discriminate high-risk from low-risk lesions.Fluorescence spectroscopy combined with 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX fluorescence in detecting oral premalignancy.Early detection of premalignant/malignant lesions in the oral cavity can certainly improve the patient's prognosis. This study presents fluorescence imaging with the topical application of 5-aminolevulinic as a way to improve detection of various oral tissue pathologies. This procedure depends mainly on comparing the intensity of red and green fluorescence emitted from tissues during examination.Seventy-one patients who presented with clinically suspicious oral leukoplakia were recruited for this study. Each of the patients was required to have 5-aminolevulinic acid in the form of mouth rinse prior to fluorescence imaging. Following this a surgical biopsy was acquired from the exact examination site. The results of the fluorescence spectroscopy have been compared with histopathology.A Student's t-test was applied to test the viability of the ratio between red and green fluorescence. The red-to-green ratio was found to increase significantly when the lesion was identified as dysplastic or carcinoma in situ. By applying a threshold line to discriminate between normal and dysplastic lesions; a sensitivity of 83-90% and specificity of 79-89% were obtained.Fluorescence spectroscopy combined with 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX was found as a valuable tool in the diagnosis of oral premalignancy. This technique offers the potential to be advantageous over other non-optical techniques in terms of providing real-time diagnosis, in situ monitoring, cost effectiveness and more tolerated by patient compared to surgical biopsy.A pilot case control study on the efficacy of acetic acid wash and chemiluminescent illumination (ViziLite) in the visualisation of oral mucosal white lesions.Conventional screening practice for oral lesions involves visual scrutiny of the oral tissues with the naked eye under projected incandescent or halogen illumination. Visualisation is the principal strategy used to assess patients' lesions at risk for malignant transformation; hence, any procedure which highlights such lesions should aid the clinician. The aim of this pilot study was to examine the efficacy of acetic acid wash and chemiluminescent light (ViziLite) in enhancing visualisation of oral mucosal white lesions, and its ability to highlight malignant and potentially malignant lesions. Fifty five patients referred for assessment of an oral white lesion, were prospectively screened with ViziLite, and an incisional scalpel biopsy performed for a definitive diagnosis. The size, location, ease of visibility, border distinctness, and presence of satellite lesions were recorded. The ViziLite tool enhanced intra-oral visualisation of 26 white lesions. Indeed, all lesions appeared "aceto-white", regardless of the definitive diagnosis. Examination of the oral tissues with ViziLite illumination did not change the provisional diagnosis, nor alter the biopsy site. ViziLite illumination does not discriminate between keratotic, inflammatory, malignant or potentially malignant oral mucosal white lesions and thus, a high index of suspicion, expert clinical judgment, and scalpel biopsy are still essential for proper patient care.Cytologic and DNA-cytometric examination of oral lesions in lichen planus.The aim of the present study was to evaluate the diagnostic value of exfoliative cytology (EC) and DNA image cytometry applied to oral lesions of lichen planus (LP; n = 56), in order to detect or exclude malignant transformation.Brush and excisional biopsies were obtained from 56 patients. In cases of oral LP in which brush biopsies were suspicious for tumor cells, nuclear DNA contents were measured, using a TV Image Analysis System.In 50 patients EC yielded tumor cell-negative, doubtful in four cases and suspicious results obtained in two cases. DNA image cytometry revealed DNA-aneuploidy only in the two suspicious cases. The comparison between cytologic/DNA-cytometric diagnosis and biopsy histology resulted in a total agreement (LP without dysplasia: 54 and squamous cell carcinoma in LP: two cases).In conclusion, cytology with DNA-cytometry is a highly sensitive, specific, and non-invasive method, which can be used for periodical follow up of oral LP lesions in order to early detect or exclude malignancy.[Performance of conventional oral brush biopsies].This study evaluated the performance of oral brush biopsies using standard morphological analysis and haematoxylin and eosin (HE) staining for detecting oral squamous cell carcinomas and their respective precursor lesionsBrush biopsies were obtained in 169 consecutive patients who underwent routine biopsies and histological examination for clinically suspicious oral lesions. Air-dried smears were processed by acetone fixation and HE staining. Cytological assessment used well-established criteria of atypia to classify the specimen as either "tumor negative" (no signs of atypia, no malignant cells) or "tumor positive" (malignant cells, any sign of atypia or doubtful cells).Despite a sufficient number of cells, a definite cytological diagnosis could not be established in six cases. According to the criteria specified above, these specimens were classified as "tumor positive." The cytological analysis identified 49 out of 62 oral malignancies (sensitivity 79%). Seven out of 107 benign lesions were classified as false positive (specificity 93%). The positive and negative predictive values were each 88%.Oral brush biopsies will identify only about 80% of oral malignancies when the smears are processed by routine HE stains and are analysed via standard morphological criteria. Thus, this technique should not be used for diagnostic proof or to exclude malignant cells in a lesion suspicious for cancer. However, oral brush biopsy provides a versatile back-up strategy to uncover the true nature of the disease if a lesion is clinically considered benign by mistake.Reliability of toluidine blue vital staining in detection of potentially malignant oral lesions--time to reconsider.Being simple and inexpensive toluidine blue has been in use for more than two decades for the detection of potentially malignant oral lesions (PMOL's) and malignant lesions. Although there has been concensus that staining often assists in the identification of these lesions, results have been diverse. In most studies false negative were not recorded as biopsies of lesions that did not retain toluidine blue were not performed. Thus the present study attempted to evaluate the efficacy of toluidine blue vital dye for detection of PMOL's. The study included 47 biopsies (TBP:35 and TBN:12), of which 23 cases were confirmed as dysplastic (TBP=17 and TBN=6), 7 as hyperkeratosis (TBP=4 and TBN=3), 8 as epithelial hyperplasia (TBP=6 and TBN=3) and 5 as other benign lesions (TBP=4 and TBN=1). The validity test revealed a senstivity of 73.9% and specificity of 30%. The positive predictive value was 54.8% and negative predictive value of 50%. The study intends to highlight the false negative result (26.1%) which was mainly attributed to mild dysplasia and the false positive (32.6%) which included hyperkeratosis, hyperplasia, lichen planus and traumatic ulcer. The study concludes that toluidine blue staining should not blindly direct the clinician's opinion, and strongly discourages the use of toludine blue as a screening test and the results should be interpreted with caution.Diagnostic efficiency of toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine in oral premalignant and malignant lesions.In vivo stains are prompt resources, which have emerged, in the recent years, to aid as clinical diagnostic tools in detecting early premalignant and malignant lesions. The aim of the study was to determine the diagnostic efficiency of toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine in oral premalignancies and malignancies and to evaluate the reliability of in vivo staining with toluidine blue and Lugol's iodine in the lesions at risk of malignancy.The study group comprised 30 subjects with clinically suspicious premalignant lesions and 30 subjects with clinically suspicious malignant lesions. All the lesions were stained consecutively with toluidine blue and Lugol's iodine and the dye retention were recorded with photographs. Depending on the retention of the dyes, the biopsy site was determined. The biopsy specimens were sent for histological confirmation and results were statistically analyzed.The overall diagnostic accuracy of Lugol's iodine when used consecutively with toluidine blue stain in distinguishing premalignant lesions and malignant lesions was 90%. As the degree of differentiation of malignant lesions progressed toward more severity, they failed to show the retention of Lugol's iodine and the result was highly significant statistically, with a P value < 0.001.Lugol's iodine when used with toluidine blue helped in delineating the inflammatory lesions and was the mean source in determining clinically the degrees of differentiation of malignant lesions as the poorly differentiated malignant lesions without glycogen content failed to show Lugol's iodine retention. Toluidine blue with Lugol's iodine can be used as a pretherapeutic assessment of the biologic aggressiveness of the disease.Improving detection of precancerous and cancerous oral lesions. Computer-assisted analysis of the oral brush biopsy. U.S. Collaborative OralCDx Study Group.A study group composed of researchers from across the United States undertook a study to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of OralCDx (OralScan Laboratories Inc.), a computer-assisted method of analysis of the oral brush biopsy, in the detection of precancerous and cancerous lesions of the oral mucosa.The study group conducted a multicenter double-blind study comparing results of OralCDx analysis with those of scalpel biopsy of suspicious oral lesions, as well as using OralCDx on oral lesions that appeared benign clinically.In 945 patients, OralCDx independently detected every case of histologically confirmed oral dysplasia and carcinoma (sensitivity = 100 percent, false-negative rate = 0 percent). Every OralCDx "positive" result was subsequently confirmed by histology as dysplasia or carcinoma. The specificity for the OralCDx "positive" result was 100 percent, while the specificity for the OralCDx "atypical" results was 92.9 percent. In 4.5 percent of clinically benign-appearing lesions that would not have received additional testing or attention other than clinical follow-up, OralCDx uncovered dysplasia or carcinoma (statistical sensitivity > 96 percent, P < .05, n = 131; statistical specificity for the OralCDx "positive" result > 97 percent and for the "atypical" result > 90 percent, P < .05, n = 196).The authors propose that this multicenter trial demonstrates that OralCDx is a highly accurate method of detecting oral precancerous and cancerous lesions. OralCDx can aid in confirming the nature of apparently benign oral lesions and, more significantly, revealing those that are precancerous and cancerous when they are not clinically suspected of being so. All OralCDx "atypical" and "positive" results should be referred for scalpel biopsy and histology to completely characterize the lesion.Given the difficulty in clinically differentiating premalignant and malignant lesions from benign lesions with a similar appearance, OralCDx appears to determine the significance of an oral lesion definitively and detect innocuous-appearing oral cancers at early, curable stages.Cytology of the oral cavity: a re-evaluation.Oral exfoliative cytology, while an economical and practical tool for diagnosis of squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, is not extensively used. The results of conventional (n = 89) and liquid-based (n = 411) oral diagnostic cytology cases are reported and compared to histological diagnosis. Cells were collected using either a Cytobrush device for conventional smears or a dermatological curette (AcuDispo) for liquid-based (Thin Prep) cytology. The "curette technique" allowed for the collection of "accidental" tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies. The sensitivity was 86.5% in conventional and 94.7% in liquid-based cytology; specificity was 94.3% and 98.9%, respectively; inadequate samples were present in 12.4% and 8.8% of cases, respectively. Although conventional cytology may be useful in oral squamous cell carcinoma and potentially malignant lesions, liquid-based cytology gives better results, enhances both the sensitivity and specificity, and also provides material for further investigations, e.g. DNA ploidy studies, microhistology, etc.Improved diagnosis of oral premalignant lesions in submucous fibrosis patients with 5-aminolevulinic acid induced PpIX fluorescence.We investigate the possibility of using ALA-derived PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy for the detection of epithelial hyperkeratosis (EH) or epithelial dysplasia (ED) lesions in oral submucous fibrosis (OSF) patients that could not be found by autofluorescence spectroscopy. Twenty percent of ALA solution gel was applied onto oral neoplasia and surrounding normal tissue [normal oral mucosa (NOM)] for 90 min. Fluorescence emission spectra were measured under 410 nm excitation. Generally, the most intense fluorescence emission peaks occurred at 460 and 630 nm. The ratios of the area under red peak (630+/-10 nm) to the area under blue peak (460+/-10 nm), denoted as RB, were calculated. We found that OSF mucosa has the lowest RB value, followed by NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF. An ANOVA test showed significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (p<0.05). However, measurements of autofluorescence (i.e., before ALA application) show no significant differences between OSF, NOM, EH on OSF, and ED on OSF (ANOVA test, p>0.05). These results indicate that ALA-induced PpIX fluorescence spectroscopy could be used to identify the premalignant lesions on oral fibrotic mucosa, which could not be found by autofluorescence.Sensitivity and specificity of oral brush biopsy.The aim of this study was to evaluate the advantage of computer-assisted analysis of the oral brush biopsy compared with synchronous scalpel biopsy in the early detection of oral lesions. In this prospective, randomized, controlled study, brush and scalpel biopsies were performed on 75 patients. Six patients had to be excluded due to inadequate results, and 43 were shown to have dysplastic epithelium, 15 carcinoma, and 11 suspicious lesions. Therefore, the sensitivity for the detection of abnormal cells by means of OralCDx was 52%, specificity 29%, and the positive predictive value 63%. According to our results, the use of oral brush biopsy as a standardized, minimally invasive method of screening oral lesions should be reconsidered.Sensitivity and specificity of OraScan (R) toluidine blue mouthrinse in the detection of oral cancer and precancer.The efficacy of 1% toluidine blue in the identification of oral malignancies and potentially malignant oral lesions was evaluated among a group of Asian patients (n = 102) with undiagnosed oral mucosal lesions and conditions (n = 145). The trial, utilising a ready-to-use kit, was controlled by histopathologic evaluation of a total of 87 dye-retained or dye-negative lesions. Eighteen oral carcinomas all retained the dye and there were no false negatives, yielding a test sensitivity of 100%. Eight of 39 oral epithelial dysplasias were toluidine blue-negative, giving a false negative rate of 20.5% and a sensitivity of 79.5% for oral epithelial dysplasias. The specificity of the technique was low (62%). Five dysplastic lesions were detected solely by the kit and this suggests that the method is valuable for surveillance of high-risk subjects in addition to its remarkable sensitivity in the detection of invasive carcinoma.Diffuse reflection spectroscopy: an alternative to autofluorescence spectroscopy in tongue cancer detection.Laser-induced autofluorescence (LIAF) and diffuse reflection spectroscopy (DRS) are two emerging noninvasive optical tools that have shown immense potential to detect oral cavity pre-cancer. In a recent study, we have used spectral ratio reference standards (SRRS) of LIAF intensity ratios F500/F635, F500/F685, and F500/F705 for grading of tissues belonging to sites other than dorsal side of tongue (DST), lateral side of tongue (LST), and vermillion border of lip (VBL) that exhibited similar spectral shape for normal and abnormal tissues. This led to dismal diagnostic accuracies, and for the three LIAF-SRRS, normal tissue values were often misclassified as squamous cell carcinoma (SCC), which means that the true negatives were being wrongly identified as true positives. This study examines the applicability of the site-specific diffuse reflection spectral intensity ratio (R545/R575) of the oxygenated hemoglobin bands to classify different DST lesions and compares the results obtained with those obtained using LIAF-SRRS. DRS-SRRS of R545/R575 differentiated benign hyperplastic DST tissues from normal tissue with a sensitivity of 86% and specificity of 80%, which were indistinguishable using LIAF-SRRS. Further, in distinguishing hyperplastic tissues from premalignant dysplastic lesions, DRS-SRRS gave a sensitivity of 90% and a specificity of 86%, as compared to sensitivity of 89% and specificity of 72% shown by the three LIAF-SRRS together. The diagnostic accuracy and statistical adequacy of the two techniques were assessed by receiver operating characteristic curve (ROC-Curve) analysis. Three LIAF ratios gave a low overall ROC area under curve (ROC-AUCs) of 0.521, whereas the DR ratio (R545/R575) has shown an improved accuracy of 0.970 in differentiating different tissue types. While distinguishing hyperplastic from dysplastic tissues, the DR ratio gave a higher discrimination accuracy of 0.9. Based on these findings, it can be concluded that the DRS-SRRS technique by virtue of its low cost and higher diagnostic accuracies could be a viable alternate to LIAF-SRRS for in vivo screening of tongue pre-cancers and grading of different tissue types.[Toluidine blue solution as a diagnostic aid in oropharyngeal cancer].In the literature exist investigations made to extensive series of patients, with premalignant oral lesions or suspicious of malignancy, in which it has been employed toluidine blue (TB), to verify the trustiness of this method as a resource for support in clinical diagnosis. The results are favourable whenever is observed the correct realization of the technique that must be preceded by a careful buccal exploration and that both findings be corroborated. This work tries to exemplificate one of the techniques of TB as will as the results obtained in 28 patients, whom, for their characteristics were considered of High Risk. Emphasis is made in relation to the false positive found. Besides, is insisted in the convenience of the routine use of this resource in the odontologic private practice and at institutional level in patients over 50 years old, to whom is necessary to accomplish at a time an adequate patient history and an accurate intraoral examination, that in addition to the use of TB, will make feasible to detect more cases of malignant lesions in early stages.Toluidine blue staining and early detection of oral precancerous and malignant lesions.Noninvasive evaluation of oral lesions using depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy.Optical spectroscopy is a noninvasive technique with potential applications for diagnosis of oral dysplasia and early cancer. In this study, we evaluated the diagnostic performance of a depth-sensitive optical spectroscopy (DSOS) system for distinguishing dysplasia and carcinoma from non-neoplastic oral mucosa.Patients with oral lesions and volunteers without any oral abnormalities were recruited to participate. Autofluorescence and diffuse reflectance spectra of selected oral sites were measured using the DSOS system. A total of 424 oral sites in 124 subjects were measured and analyzed, including 154 sites in 60 patients with oral lesions and 270 sites in 64 normal volunteers. Measured optical spectra were used to develop computer-based algorithms to identify the presence of dysplasia or cancer. Sensitivity and specificity were calculated using a gold standard of histopathology for patient sites and clinical impression for normal volunteer sites.Differences in oral spectra were observed in: (1) neoplastic versus nonneoplastic sites, (2) keratinized versus nonkeratinized tissue, and (3) shallow versus deep depths within oral tissue. Algorithms based on spectra from 310 nonkeratinized anatomic sites (buccal, tongue, floor of mouth, and lip) yielded an area under the receiver operating characteristic curve of 0.96 in the training set and 0.93 in the validation set.The ability to selectively target epithelial and shallow stromal depth regions appeared to be diagnostically useful. For nonkeratinized oral sites, the sensitivity and specificity of this objective diagnostic technique were comparable to that of clinical diagnosis by expert observers. Thus, DSOS has potential to augment oral cancer screening efforts in community settings.The usefulness of toluidine staining as a diagnostic tool for precancerous and cancerous oropharyngeal and oral cavity lesions.Toluidine blue stain is used as a marker to differentiate lesions at high risk of progression in order to improve early diagnosis of oropharyngeal carcinomas. This study focused on 45 oral mucosal lesions in 32 patients (13 female, 19 male). In 9 cases, multiple biopsies were collected. Of the 45 lesions examined, 26 (57.0%) were defined clinically benign, while 19 (42.3%) were defined as suspected lesions (premalignant or malignant). According to the clinical examination, the sensitivity was 53% (16/30) and for toluidine blue staining 96.2% (26/27) (p = 0.0007). The specificity was 80% (12/15) for clinical examination and 77.7% (14/15) for toluidine blue staining (p = 0.79). In conclusion toluidine blue stain has been shown to be a reliable aid when clinical examination is unable to differentiate lesions at high risk of progression and then it improves early diagnosis for oral cavity and oropharyngeal cancer.Reliability of cytologic smear in diagnosis of oral cancer. A controlled study.Laser-induced fluorescence imaging in localization of head and neck cancers.Laser-induced fluorescence tumor imaging exploits the difference in tissue autofluorescence properties between normal and cancerous tissues. The effectiveness and reliability of fluorescence imaging with a lung imaging fluorescence endoscopy (LIFE) system for cancers in the head and neck were compared to those of white light endoscopy (WLE). Examinations by WLE and LIFE were conducted on 25 patients suspected for malignancy. Histologic diagnosis was confirmed by biopsy. Posttreatment evaluations were performed on 6 cancer patients identified by this study. By LIFE, all 16 cancerous lesions, including 2 occult cancers, were identified (100%), while WLE achieved only an 87.5% detection rate. LIFE (specificity 87.5%) was greatly helpful to WLE (specificity 50%) in differentiating inflammation from malignancy, though it failed to exclude granuloma. The results of this study suggest potential roles of LIFE in early detection, correct staging, and treatment evaluation of cancers in the head and neck.Oral fluorescence imaging using 405-nm excitation, aiding the discrimination of cancers and precancers by identifying changes in collagen and elastic breakdown and neovascularization in the underlying stroma.Optical spectroscopy and imaging devices are being developed and tested for the screening and diagnosis of cancer and precancer in multiple organ sites.The aim of the study reported here is to optimize the capability of an optical imaging device to discriminate precancerous tissue from other lesions by identifying ideal excitation wavelengths.The studies reported here used a prototype of a direct fluorescence imaging device that uses 405-nm illumination to excite tissue.There is ample evidence in the literature that 405 nm can distinguish oral cancers from normal tissue. Higher wavelengths may be necessary to differentiate potential confounding lesions, such as abrasions, burns, viral infections, inflammation, and gingivitis.Imaging at 405 nm could help doctors detect precancerous and cancerous oral lesions. Such imaging could be used by dentists, family practitioners, otorhinolaryngologists, general surgeons, obstetrician gynecologists, and internists, and could greatly increase the number of patients who have lesions detected in the precancerous phase.Diagnostic efficiency of differentiating small cancerous and precancerous lesions using mucosal brush smears of the oral cavity--a prospective and blinded study.The aim of this study was to evaluate the diagnostic accuracy of oral brush biopsy to identify early malignancy. One hundred and eighty-six brush biopsies of suspicious mucosal lesions were obtained, haematoxilin and eosin (H&E)-stained and compared with the histology of conventional excision biopsies of the same site performed concomitantly. The sensitivity for identifying squamous cell carcinoma (SCC) was 88.5%. High-risk lesions including squamous intraepithelial neoplasia (SIN II, SIN III) and SCC were identified with a sensitivity of 86.4%, using a pap-analogous classification, which is considered to be carcinomatous, as well as moderate and severe dysplastic cells positive. Depending on the cytopathologic definition for malignancy and the tumour size, the test accuracy varied: Extending the cytopathologic criteria for malignancy by defining all dysplastic or malignant cytopathologic findings as positive, the sensitivity was increased to 95.2% at the expense of the specificity, which was reduced from 94.9% to 82.3%. Separately analysing SCCs of less than 20 mm, the sensitivity was reduced by 9.5% to 78%. Although small malignant lesions seem to be less reliable by the conventional oral brush biopsy, it is a useful screening instrument for early diagnosis of suspicious, epithelial lesions and could therefore contribute to improved cancer prognosis.The impact of liquid-based oral cytology on the diagnosis of oral squamous dysplasia and carcinoma.Even though diagnostic oral exfoliative cytology is a useful, economical and practical tool in the diagnosis of oral dysplasia and carcinoma, it is not yet extensively used. The results of conventional exfoliative and liquid-based diagnostic cytology in oral potentially malignant lesions (PML) are herein reported and compared with the histological diagnosis.Either conventional (89) or liquid-based (384) exfoliative cytology was used for the diagnosis of oral dysplasia/carcinoma in 473 subjects and the results were compared with scalpel biopsy histology. Cells were collected using a Cytobrush device for conventional smears and with a dermatological curette for the liquid-based cytology. The 'curette technique' also allowed for the collection of 'accidental' tissue fragments, utilized as microbiopsies.Histological diagnosis was squamous carcinoma in 96 of 473 cases, high-grade dysplasia (oral intraepithelial neoplasia two to three) in 24 and other lesions in 353 cases. The smears in the conventional cytology group were inadequate in 12.4%, with an 85.7% sensitivity and a 95.9% specificity. There were 8.8% of inadequate specimens in the liquid-based cytology group; sensitivity was 95.1% and specificity was 99.0%.Although conventional cytology is useful when diagnosing oral PML (better sensitivity and predictive positive value if compared with the cervical smear test with similar specificity) and can improve the accuracy of histological diagnosis, liquid-based cytology gives better results, as it not only enhances both sensitivity and specificity, but also provides material for further investigation (AgNORs, DNA, microbiopsies, etc.).Laminin-5 immunocytochemistry: a new tool for identifying dysplastic cells in oral brush biopsies.The brush biopsy technique is not only a seminal technique but also a critically discussed method for detection of oral pre-cancerous stages and manifest carcinomas. The gamma2 chain of laminin-5 and its proteolytic fragments comprise an invasion factor for many carcinomas.The aim of this study was to determine whether the immunocytochemical presentation of the laminin gamma2 chain identifies pre-invasive or invasive squamous cells in brush biopsies.The value-based identification of atypical epithelia was analysed in 93 consecutive brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses: standardized haematoxylin and eosin staining; standardized immunocytochemistry: monoclonal antibodies against laminin gamma2 chain: D4B5, 4G1, detection using ChemMate and Autostainer.Conventional cytology did not result in any false-positive cases, i.e. atypical cells in normal, inflamed or benignly hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity, 100%), whereas immunocytochemistry revealed one false-positive case (specificity, 98%). In brush biopsies of oral squamous cell carcinomas, the following immunocytochemical patterns were possible: (1) staining of the cytoplasm, (2) banded markings between clumped carcinoma cells and (3) positive hazes surrounding atypical cells. Bacterial colonies appeared as false-positive results. Four of 27 carcinomas and one of three recurrences were not cytologically identified (sensitivity of conventional cytology, 79%). Three of the five carcinomas not identified by cytology were immunocytochemically stained with laminin gamma2 chain antibody (sensitivity of laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry, 93%). The positive predictive value was 100% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry. The negative predictive value attained was 92% for conventional cytology and 97% for laminin gamma2 chain immunocytochemistry.The high sensitivity level observed for method-enhanced brush cytology suggests that this technique be used as an initial diagnostic step.Utility of toluidine blue as a diagnostic adjunct in the detection of potentially malignant disorders of the oral cavity--a clinical and histological assessment. The value of chairside adjunctive tests in the detection of oral potentially malignant disorders (OPMDs) remains uncertain. To determine the effectiveness of toluidine blue in detecting leukoplakia and erythroplakia and its accuracy in identifying cases with oral epithelial dysplasia. Ninety-two patients attending two oral medicine clinics in London, presenting with white and red patches of the oral mucosa, were investigated by the application of toluidine blue. Eighty-two patients were clinically diagnosed as OPMDs and 10 were frictional keratoses. A surgical biopsy was performed to assess epithelial dysplasia.Of 64 oral leukoplakias, 34 (53.1%) were positive for toluidine blue and among nine erythroplakias seven stained positive. Of 41 oral dysplasia cases, a little more than half of the lesions (n = 23) were stain positive, an estimated sensitivity of 56.1%. TBlue test had a higher sensitivity for detecting higher-grade dysplastic lesions (5/8 moderate dysplasia, sensitivity 62.5%; 5/7 severe dysplasia; sensitivity 71.4%) compared with lower grades of dysplasia, but the differences were not significant (P = 0.60).We report here the utility of TBlue for the detection of oral leukoplakia and erythroplakia. The test has the potential to detect OPMDs and yielded a sensitivity of 56.1% and specificity of 56.9% to detect oral epithelial dysplasia.Detection of squamous cell carcinoma of the oral cavity by imaging 5-aminolevulinic acid-induced protoporphyrin IX fluorescence.Early cancer detection is the best way to improve the prognosis of patients with oral cancer. Therefore this study presents quantitative fluorescence measurements and results in the visualization of cancerous oral mucosa with 5-aminolevulinic acid (5-ALA)-induced protoporphyrin IX (PPIX).Time progression and type of porphyrin accumulation were analyzed in neoplastic and surrounding healthy tissue of 58 patients with a suspected cancer of the oral cavity by measuring emission spectra of 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence. Fluorescence images in the red and green spectral range from the tumor tissue were recorded with a charge-coupled device camera.After topical application of 0.4% 5-ALA and incubation for 1 to 2.5 hours, all patients revealed higher intensities of red fluorescence in neoplastic tissue compared with the surrounding normal tissue. Maximum contrast was reached after 1.5 hours of incubation. In 13.8% (n = 8) of the patients, additional findings like dysplasia, carcinoma in situ, primary tumor, secondary carcinomas, and tumor branches were found by means of fluorescence marking in contrast to white light examination. An evaluation of the biopsy specimens resulted in a specificity of 60% and a sensitivity of 99%.As a fluorescent marker, PPIX could represent a possible new diagnostic tool to detect early malignant and secondary lesions in the oral cavity. In addition, 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence is promising as a useful intraoperative tool for determining adequate surgical margins of resection. Further investigations aim to assess this diagnostic procedure as a sensitive and clinically reliable method for patients with oral cancer.Effectiveness of autofluorescence to identify suspicious oral lesions--a prospective, blinded clinical trial.Regular screening through white light inspection of the entire oral mucosa is the most important examination method to identify precancerous lesions and early oral carcinoma. Additionally, the physiologic autofluorescence of the oral mucosa has been described as a novel screening method for the detection of mucosal lesions that are not visible by white light. This study aimed to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of the autofluorescence examination. Seventy-eight patients were examined in this study. All of them suffered from suspicious oral mucosal lesions. Two different investigation methods were applied: the standard examination by white light and an examination by a novel light source of 400 nm that evoked a green light emission (>500 nm) in normal mucosa. It was proposed that malignant oral mucosal lesions show different autofluorescence characteristics than the green autofluorescence of healthy mucosa. Red autofluorescence indicated SCC with a sensitivity of 20% and a specificity of 98%. The results showed that dysplasia and carcinoma could be identified with a sensitivity of 96% and a specificity of 18% by using the autofluorescence method. The sensitivity decreased according to the grade of mucosal keratosis and was influenced by the localisation of the lesion. In conclusion, benign as well as malignant oral lesions could not be distinguished by a diminished autofluorescence signal. A red autofluorescence signal, however, could indicate cancerous processes of the oral mucosa.Comparison of computer-assisted brush biopsy results with follow up scalpel biopsy and histology.Oral brush biopsy results were compared with scalpel biopsy and histology to determine the positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy finding. Of 243 patients with abnormal brush biopsies, 93 proved positive for dysplasia (79) or carcinoma (14) and 150 were negative for either dysplasia or carcinoma. Therefore, the positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy was 38% (93/243). By using the oral brush biopsy, dentists can inform their patients that abnormal findings have a strong positive predictive value for dysplasia or carcinoma and therefore require follow-up confirmation by scalpel biopsy.The use of an oral brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis in the evaluation of oral lesions: a study of 94 patients.The objective of this study was to evaluate the sensitivity and specificity of modified brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis in the detection of oral premalignant and malignant lesions.Ninety-four patients attending outpatient clinics who exhibited oral lesions suspicious of premalignancy or malignancy were enrolled. All patients underwent an oral brush biopsy using a baby toothbrush followed by a scalpel biopsy. The specimens were analyzed manually in a double-blinded fashion. Sensitivity and specificity were used for the statistical analysis of the samples. Statistical significance was determined using the normal approximation to the binomial distribution of matched results, approximated by the Student t distribution mean test (paired t test).Seventy-nine patients with adequate transepithelial brush biopsy samples were included in the study group. When compared to scalpel biopsy, the statistical sensitivity of the brush biopsy was greater than 76.8% (P < .05) while the statistical specificity was greater than 93.3% (P < .05). There were 4 false negative brush biopsy cases. The 4 false negative patients turned out to be dysplasia/ malignancy on histopathology. All 4 were patients with clinical oral submucous fibrosis.The oral brush biopsy without computer-assisted analysis was found to be a painless, noninvasive test for evaluating oral lesions. The toothbrush brush biopsy with manual analysis had much [corrected] lower sensitivity and specificity than the commercially available oral brush biopsy with computer-assisted analysis. The results demonstrate that by using a toothbrush to obtain an oral brush biopsy sample, oral lesions can be easily evaluated in a resource challenged settings to rule out dysplasia and carcinoma.An audit of the efficacy of the oral brush biopsy technique in a specialist Oral Medicine unit.The diagnosis of oral epithelial dysplasia has traditionally been based upon histopathological evaluation of a full thickness biopsy specimen from lesional tissue. It has recently been proposed that cytological examination of "brush biopsy" samples is a non-invasive method of determining the presence of cellular atypia, and hence the likelihood of oral epithelial dysplasia. The present audit determined, retrospectively the sensitivity, specificity and positive and negative predictive values of the oral brush biopsy technique in the diagnosis of potentially malignant disease in a group of 112 patients attending a specialist Oral Medicine unit. The sensitivity of detection of oral epithelial dysplasia or squamous cell carcinoma of the oral brush biopsy system was 71.4% while the specificity was 32%. The positive predictive value of an abnormal brush biopsy result (positive or atypical) was 44.1%, while the negative predictive value was 60%. It is concluded that not all potentially malignant disease is detected with this non-invasive investigative procedure.The sensitivity and specificity of the OralCDx technique: evaluation of 103 cases.In this study, we compared 103 OralCDx results with the histological findings of 96 clinical sites in 80 patients (33 females; 64.3+/-13.7 years and 47 males; 53.2+/-11.5 years). The histological findings were classified as follows: compatible with oral leukoplakia (OL; n = 60) or oral lichen planus (OLP; n = 17), both without dysplasia; dysplasia in OL or OLP (n = 9); and oral squamous cell carcinoma (OSCC; n = 17). There were seven (6.8%) specimens with an inadequate cell count. Overall, the sensitivity of the OralCDx technique to detect dysplasia and OSCC was 92.3% (95% CI: 74.9-99.1%), and the specificity was 94.3% (95% CI: 86.0-98.4%). The positive likelihood ratio (LR+) was 16.2 (95% CI: 6.2-42.1) and the negative likelihood ratio (LR-) was 0.08 (95% CI: 0.02-0.31). In conclusion, these figures are in agreement with previously published data and support the use of OralCDx as a screening tool of oral lesions, but further trials are still necessary.A comparative study of normal inspection, autofluorescence and 5-ALA-induced PPIX fluorescence for oral cancer diagnosis.Fluorescence diagnosis aims to improve the management of oral cancer via early detection of the malignant lesions and better delimitation of the tumor margins. This paper presents a comparative study of normal inspection, combined fluorescence diagnosis (CFD) and its 2 main components, autofluorescence and 5-aminolevulinic acid (5-ALA)-induced protoporphyrin IX (PPIX) fluorescence. Biopsy-controlled fluorescence imaging and spectral analysis were performed on a total of 85 patients with suspected or histologically proven oral carcinoma both before and after topical administration of 5-ALA (200 mg 5-ALA dissolved in 50 ml of H(2)0). Fluorescence excitation was accomplished using filtered light of a xenon short arc lamp (lambda = 375-440 nm). As for CFD, a "streetlight" contrast (red to green) was readily found between malignant and healthy tissue on the acquired images. In terms of tumor localization and delimitation properties, CFD was clearly favorable over either normal inspection or its 2 components in fluorescence imaging. The performance of CFD was found to be impeded by tumor keratinization but to be independent of either tumor staging, grading or localization. In spectral analysis, cancerous tissue showed significantly higher PPIX fluorescence intensities and lower autofluorescence intensities than normal mucosa. There is a great potential for CFD in early detection of oral neoplasms and exact delimitation of the tumors' superficial margins and an advantage over white light inspection and each of its 2 main components. The method is noninvasive, safe and easily reproducible.The assessment of diffused light illumination and acetic acid rinse (Microlux/DL) in the visualisation of oral mucosal lesions.Oral examination alone cannot always distinguish benign from premalignant and malignant lesions, thereby resulting in delayed patient referral and poorer prognosis. Thus, any non-invasive technology which highlights oral premalignant and malignant lesions in a highly sensitive and specific manner will undoubtedly aid clinicians in early diagnosis and treatment of these conditions. The aim of this study was to assess the efficacy of acetic acid mouthwash and diffused light illumination (Microlux/DL) as a diagnostic aid in the visualisation of oral mucosal lesions and its ability to highlight malignant and potentially malignant lesions. Fifty patients referred for assessment of an oral white lesion were initially examined under routine incandescent operatory light. The location, size, ease of visibility, border distinctness and presence of satellite lesions were recorded. Clinical examination was repeated using the Microlux/DL diffused light illumination kit. An incisional biopsy was performed to provide a definitive histopathological diagnosis. Microlux/DL examination enhanced the visibility of 34 lesions, however, it did not help uncover any clinically undetected lesions, change the provisional diagnosis, or alter the biopsy site. Microlux/DL showed a sensitivity of 77.8% and a specificity of 70.7%, with a positive predictive value of 36.8%. Although Microlux/DL appears useful at enhancing lesion visibility, it is a poor discriminator for inflammatory, traumatic and malignant lesions.[Noninvasive brush biopsy as an innovative tool for early detection of oral carcinomas].The aim of this prospective study was to investigate the diagnostic accuracy of DNA image cytometry in combination with non-invasive brush biopsies taken from suspicious oral lesions.Cytological diagnoses obtained from 1328 exfoliative smears of 332 different lesions were compared with histology and/or clinical follow-ups of the respective patients. Additionally, nuclear DNA contents were measured after Feulgen restaining using a TV image analysis system. DNA aneuploidy was assumed if abnormal DNA stemlines or cells with DNA content greater than 9c were observed. RESULTS; The sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis in addition to DNA image cytometry on oral smears for the detection of cancer cells was 97.8%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value 100%, and negative predictive value 98.1%.The application of DNA image cytometry with DNA aneuploidy as a marker for neoplastic transformation in oral smears secures cytologic diagnosis of carcinomas. Smears from brushings of all visible oral lesions are an easily practicable, cheap, noninvasive, painless, and safe screening method for detection of oral precancerous lesions and squamous cell carcinoma in all stages. We conclude that DNA image cytometry is a very sensitive and highly specific, objective, and reproducible adjuvant tool for identification of neoplastic cells in oral smears.RELIABILITY OF ORAL EXFOLIATIVE CYTOLOGY FOR DETECTION OF ORAL CANCER.High-molecular tenascin-C as an indicator of atypical cells in oral brush biopsies.Tumour-invasion like wound healing is characterised by the formation of an extracellular matrix with a high tenascin-C content. The tenascin-C molecule undergoes alternative splicing. Analysis using antibody BC2 indicates that especially the high-molecular tenascin-C (hm tn-C) variants are typically tumour-associated, while distribution in normal tissue is restrictive. This study investigated whether hm tn-C is a suitable indicator of atypical cells with invasive potential in oral brush biopsies. One hundred fifty nine consecutive oral brush biopsies with histopathological diagnoses were analysed for the identification of atypical cells. A standardised haematoxylin and eosin staining plus standardised immunocytochemistry using the monoclonal anti-hm tn-C antibody was performed. The bound hm tn-C antibodies were detected with the streptavidine/alkaline phosphatase technique in the autostainer. Conventional cytology produced four false-positives when identifying atypical cells in brush biopsies of inflammatory/benign hyperproliferative mucosa (specificity 96%), while 10 in 52 carcinomas and three of eight recurrences were not identified (sensitivity 78%). Ten of these 13 non-identified tumours could be marked when adding the hm tn-C assay (increasing specificity to 99%). Combining the two assays also reduced the false-positive outcomes from four to one (increasing sensitivity to 95%). The positive and negative predictive values were 92 and 88% for conventional cytology vs 98 and 97% for the dual assay. (1) A 95%-sensitivity proves hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to be a suitable means of identifying atypical cells in oral brush biopsies. (2) The positive (98%) and negative (97%) predictive values obtained approximate hm tn-C assisted conventional cytology to laminin-5 (100/97%).A cross-sectional study evaluating chemiluminescence and autofluorescence in the detection of clinically innocuous precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.ViziLite Plus with TBlue system (Zila Pharmaceuticals; now Zila, a division of Tolmar, Fort Collins, Colo.) and VELscope (LED Dental, White Rock, British Columbia, Canada) are oral cancer screening aids that have been developed to assist dentists in identifying precancerous and cancerous oral lesions.The authors screened patients with an overhead examination light and then with VELscope or ViziLite. Patients with a clinically innocuous lesion underwent a biopsy, and the authors compared the results of tissue pathological analysis with findings from the screening aid tests to determine the sensitivity and specificity of each device. The authors tested these devices to determine their ability to aid in the decision-making process regarding whether further evaluation of a clinically innocuous lesion was required.The authors examined 102 lesions with ViziLite and then biopsied them [corrected]. They found three dysplasias and one malignancy, none of which were detected with the ViziLite (sensitivity = 0 percent, confidence interval [CI] = 0-60.2 percent; specificity = 75.5 percent, CI = 66.7-82.8 percent). The authors examined another 156 lesions with VELscope and then biopsied them [corrected].They found 11 dysplasias and one malignancy, six of which were detected with VELscope (sensitivity = 50 percent, CI = 21.1-78.9 percent; specificity = 38.9 percent, CI = 30.8-46.9 percent).The study results indicate that use of ViziLite or VELscope along with a conventional screening examination for lesions deemed clinically innocuous was not beneficial in identifying dysplasia or cancer. Additional clinical studies are needed before these devices can be recommended.Clinicians and patients could have a false sense of security after obtaining a negative ViziLite or VELscope examination result because potentially large numbers of precancerous and cancerous lesions will be missed by both devices.The use of the PAPNET automated cytological screening system for the diagnosis of oral squamous carcinoma.The automated PAPNET screening system has been developed to recognize abnormal cells in cervical smears. Given that the oral mucosa sheds cells resembling superficial and intermediate cells of the cervix, the aim of this study was to assess whether the PAPNET system could be used to detect dysplastic cells in oral mucosal smears. Sixty-two oral smears from 27 patients were examined by both light microscopy and using the PAPNET system from clinically abnormal and normal areas by two pathologists. The clinically abnormal sites were also biopsied for histological analysis. There was 100% correlation between the manual and PAPNET screening results. Cytological interpretation of oral smears by both manual and PAPNET screening methods correctly diagnosed squamous cell carcinoma in 14/23 (61%) of patients who had all been confirmed by biopsy. The nine patients with false-negative cases could be attributed to poor smear technique and preparation. The PAPNET system can be used to identify abnormal cells in oral smears and, as such, may have an application for screening those populations at high risk of oral cancer--provided that adequate tuition is given in smear technique.Noninvasive fluorescence excitation spectroscopy for the diagnosis of oral neoplasia in vivo.Fluorescence excitation spectroscopy (FES) is an emerging approach to cancer detection. The goal of this pilot study is to evaluate the diagnostic potential of FES technique for the detection and characterization of normal and cancerous oral lesions in vivo. Fluorescence excitation (FE) spectra from oral mucosa were recorded in the spectral range of 340 to 600 nm at 635 nm emission using a fiberoptic probe spectrofluorometer to obtain spectra from the buccal mucosa of 30 sites of 15 healthy volunteers and 15 sites of 10 cancerous patients. Significant FE spectral differences were observed between normal and well differentiated squamous cell carcinoma (WDSCC) oral lesions. The FE spectra of healthy volunteers consists of a broad emission band around 440 to 470 nm, whereas in WDSCC lesions, a new primary peak was seen at 410 nm with secondary peaks observed at 505, 540, and 580 nm due to the accumulation of porphyrins in oral lesions. The FE spectral bands of the WDSCC lesions resemble the typical absorption spectra of a porphyrin. Three potential ratios (I410/I505, I410/I540, and I410/I580) were calculated from the FE spectra and used as input variables for a stepwise linear discriminant analysis (SLDA) for normal and WDSCC groups. Leave-one-out (LOO) method of cross-validation was performed to check the reliability on spectral data for tissue characterization. The diagnostic sensitivity and specificity were determined for normal and WDSCC lesions from the scatter plot of the discriminant function scores. It was observed that diagnostic algorithm based on discriminant function scores obtained by SLDA-LOO method was able to distinguish WDSCC from normal lesions with a sensitivity of 100% and specificity of 100%. Results of the pilot study demonstrate that the FE spectral changes due to porphyrin have a good diagnostic potential; therefore, porphyrin can be used as a native tumor marker.Use of methylene blue as a diagnostic aid in early detection of oral cancer and precancerous lesions.We assessed the sensitivity, specificity, and positive and negative predictive value of methylene blue staining in the diagnosis of oral cancer in 58 patients. The sensitivity was 90%, the specificity 69%, positive predictive value 74%, and negative predictive value 87%. Because of the number of false negatives and false positives we recommend that the diagnosis should always be confirmed by histopathological examination of a biopsy specimen. Methylene blue staining may, however, be useful as a screening tool for oral cancer in large, high-risk groups in a similar way to the more expensive toluidine blue.Clinical evaluation of an autofluorescence diagnostic device for oral cancer detection: a prospective randomized diagnostic study.The prognosis for patients with oral squamous cell carcinoma remains poor despite advances in multimodal treatment concepts. Early diagnosis and treatment is the key to improved patient survival. A device (VELscope) that uses autofluorescence technology, allowing direct fluorescence visualization of the oral cavity, might be a useful tool for oral cancer detection or as an adjunct to standard clinical examination. A total of 289 patients with oral premalignant lesions were randomly divided into two groups for clinical examination of precancerous oral lesions. In group 1, 166 patients were examined conventionally with white light, and in group 2, 123 patients were examined with the autofluorescence visualization device (VELscope) in addition to the white light examination. Biopsies were obtained from all suspicious areas identified in both examination groups (n=52). In the first step, baseline characteristics of the two groups (only white light vs. white light and VELscope) were compared to exclude selection bias. In the second step, for the group examined with white light and VELscope (123 patients), the diagnostic strategies were compared with regard to sensitivity and specificity using biopsy as the gold standard. The results showed that using the VELscope leads to higher sensitivity (100% instead of 17%), but to lower specificity (74% instead of 97%). Thus, we can conclude that the VELscope is a useful new diagnostic device for detection of oral cancer diseases.The utility of toluidine blue staining and brush cytology as adjuncts in clinical examination of suspicious oral mucosal lesions.The objective of this study was to investigate the utility of toluidine blue and brush cytology in patients with clinically detected oral mucosal lesions. Clinical examination of 35 patients was completed before toluidine blue application, oral brush cytology and scalpel biopsy. Lesions were photographed before and after stain application; followed by brush cytology. All findings were compared with histopathologic results. Severe dysplasia and carcinoma-in-situ were determined as 'positive'; no dysplasia and mild to moderate dysplasia were defined as 'negative'. The sensitivity, specificity, positive and negative predictive values of clinical examination and toluidine blue were the same: 0.923, 0.433, 0.414, and 0.929, respectively. Those of brush cytology were 0.923, 0.517, 0.462, and 0.938. The concordance of all methods was 30% for benign and 61% for malignant lesions. Adjuncts identified 92% of carcinoma-in-situ and squamous cell carcinoma as confirmed by histopathology, in contrast to clinical findings alone in which 62% of these lesions were identified (p=0.046). In conclusion, adjunct diagnostic methods decreased the level of uncertainty for the diagnosis of oral malignancies and lichenoid dysplasias when applied as adjuncts to clinical examination.A study to evaluate the efficacy of toluidine blue and cytology in detecting oral cancer and dysplastic lesions.Recent advances in techniques for detecting oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma have improved the chances of early diagnosis. Adjuncts for detection of lesions include toluidine blue staining and cytologic examination. The primary objective of this study was to assess the efficacy of 1% toluidine blue (modified Mashberg technique) and cytology in detection of oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma.The study included 86 participants suspected of having oral premalignant lesions or oral squamous cell carcinoma. One percent toluidine blue was applied to the lesions, followed by cytology. A biopsy was then performed on the tissue. Histopathologically proven oral premalignant lesions/oral squamous cell carcinoma lesions were analyzed for sensitivity, specificity, postive predictive value, and negative predictive value of both screening techniques. The association of screening techniques and histopathologic diagnosis among the oral premalignant lesions, oral squamous cell carcinoma, and benign groups were analyzed using the Fisher exact test. P < .05 was considered significant.The specificity and sensitivity for oral squamous cell carcinoma and oral premalignant lesions detection of 1% toluidine blue was 81.35% and 66.67%, respectively, while cytology attained 77.97% and 70.37%, respectively. Negative predictive value and positive predictive value were 84.21% and 62.06% for 1% toluidine blue and 85.18% and 59.37% for cytologic examination, respectively. Comparison of 1% toluidine blue and cytology with histopathologic diagnosis shows a significant difference between carcinoma/epithelial dysplasia and no dysplasia and carcinoma/epithelial dysplasia and benign lesions (all, P < .05).The results of this study suggest that 1% toluidine blue and cytology have high sensitivity, specificity, and accuracy in detecting oral premalignant lesions and oral squamous cell carcinoma and can be used as an adjunct for early detection of such lesions.Analysis of oral lesion biopsies identified and evaluated by visual examination, chemiluminescence and toluidine blue.Conventional visual examination and palpation remains the gold-standard for the identification of oral mucosal lesions. The purpose of this study was to investigate the adjunctive value of a chemiluminescent light source (ViziLite, Zila Pharmaceuticals, Phoenix, Arizona) and application of pharmaceutical grade toluidine blue (TBlue(630), Zila Pharmaceuticals, Phoenix, Arizona) to further assess lesions identified during the conventional oral soft tissue examination. Lesions deemed clinically suspicious by visual examination under incandescent light were further assessed under chemiluminescence and then application of toluidine blue stain. Differences between the conventional visual examination and chemiluminescent examination were noted on four characteristics which may aid in lesion identification. Tissue retention of toluidine blue stain was documented. Each suspicious lesion was biopsied and diagnosed based upon routine histopathology. Both adjunctive exams were evaluated by comparing the histologic diagnosis. The additive value of toluidine blue stain retention was assessed in lesions diagnosed as "serious pathology" defined as severe dysplasia, carcinoma in situ and squamous cell carcinoma. Ninety-seven clinically suspicious lesions in 84 patients were identified. The chemiluminescent exam improved the brightness and/or sharpness of margin in 61.8% of identified lesions. Biopsied lesions with toluidine blue stain retention reduced the false positive rate by 55.26% while maintaining a 100% negative predictive value (NPV). Chemiluminescence was shown to increase the brightness and margins of mucosal lesions in a majority of cases and therefore may assist in identification of mucosal lesions not considered under traditional visual examination. Toluidine blue stain retention was associated with a large reduction in biopsies showing benign histology (false positive biopsy results), while maintaining a 100% NPV for the presence of severe dysplasia or cancer. Practitioners may consider use of these adjuncts in practice, however the results presented are based upon experienced providers in referral centers for mucosal disease or cancer centers and therefore positive findings may be an indication for referral to experienced providers.Comparison of the Cytobrush®, dermatological curette and oral CDx® brush test as methods for obtaining samples of RNA for molecular analysis of oral cytology.Interest in oral exfoliative cytology has increased with the availability of molecular markers that may lead to the earlier diagnosis of oral squamous cell carcinoma. This research aims to compare the efficacy of three different instruments (Cytobrush, curette and Oral CDx brush) in providing adequate material for molecular analysis.One hundred and four cytological samples obtained from volunteer healthy subjects were analysed using all three instruments. The clinical and demographical variables under study were age, sex and smoking habits. The three instruments were compared for their ability to obtain adequate samples and for the amount of RNA obtained using quantitative real-time polymerase chain reaction (PCR-qRT) analysis of the Abelson (ABL) housekeeping gene.RNA of the ABL gene has been quantified by number of copies. Adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with a curette (90.6%) or Oral CDx (80.0%) than a Cytobrush (48.6%); P < 0.001. Similarly, the RNA quantification was 17.64 ± 21.10 with a curette, 16.04 ± 15.81 with Oral CDx and 6.82 ± 6.71 with a Cytobrush. There were statistically significant differences between the Cytobrush and curette (P = 0.008) and between the Cytobrush and OralCDx (P = 0.034). There was no difference according to the demographical variables.Oral exfoliative cytology is a simple, non-invasive technique that provides sufficient RNA to perform studies on gene expression. Although material was obtained with all three instruments, adequate samples were more likely to be obtained with the curette or Oral CDx than with a Cytobrush. The Oral CDx is a less aggressive instrument than the curette, so could be a useful tool in a clinical setting.Diagnostic value of nucleolar organizer regions (AgNORs) in brush biopsies of suspicious lesions of the oral cavity.The aim of this retrospective study was to report on the diagnostic accuracy of AgNOR-analysis as an adjunctive diagnostic tool of conventional oral exfoliative cytology taken from suspicious lesions in our clinic.Cytological diagnoses obtained from brush biopsies of macroscopically suspicious lesions of the oral mucosa from 75 patients (final diagnoses: 53 histologically proven squamous cell carcinomas, 11 leukoplakias and other inflammatory oral lesions) and from 11 patients with normal mucosa as a negative control group were compared with histological and/or clinical follow-ups. Five smears were doubtful and seven suspicious for tumor cells in the cytologic report. Number of AgNOR's were counted in 100 squamous epithelial cell-nuclei per slide after silver-restaining.Sensitivity of our cytological diagnosis alone on oral smears for the detection of squamous carcinomas was 92.5%, specificity 100%, positive predictive value was 100% and negative 84.6%. The best cut-off value of the mean number of AgNOR dots per nucleus distinguishing benign from malignant cells was 4.8. The percentage of nuclei with more than three AgNORs had a cut-off level of 70%. Applying these methods to twelve doubtful or suspicious cytological diagnoses we were able to correctly establish the diagnosis of malignancy in ten cases of histologically proven cancers and to reveal benignity in two histologically proven cases. Thus we achieved a positive and negative predictive value of 100% each.Smears from brushings of visible oral lesions, if clinically considered as suspicious for cancer, are an easily practicable, non-invasive, painless, safe and accurate screening method for detection of oral cancerous lesions. We conclude that AgNOR-analysis may be a useful adjunct to other methods in routine cytological diagnosis of oral cancer that can help to solve cytologically suspicious or doubtful cases.